We rushed around the house packing the bags in the car and getting the kids up....they were just going to have to go with us to the hospital....there was no time to wait for Nana now. In the chaos of dragging two small children out of peaceful slumber, I remembered that I had wet laundry in the washing machine....well that just wouldn't do! I saw my hubby looking at me like I was crazy as I was hunched over in pain, breathing hard, and transferring laundry from the washing machine to the dryer. Only I would be idiotic enough to worry about wet clothes when a baby was swiftly working its way down my birth canal. My hubby knows what a neat freak I am so he didn't bother to scold me....as if it would've done any good. It was all I could do to force myself not to make the beds before we left. In fact, the entire time we were in the hospital, I was incredibly worried about all the unmade beds I left in our wake and I hoped that noone would have cause to go to our house and happen upon three mussy beds. You never know....Goldilocks has a reputation for that sort of thing.
Steve Martin/Lily Tomlin (All of Me)
My first layout:
With this perfect example of the form, we see the meter is strict: thirteen lines of eight syllables and two refrains, each of four syllables. The easiest parts of this format are its rhyme scheme and the limit of three stanzas.
To the family of Trayvon Martin, I would like to say: Stand tall and continue to seek justice for Trayvon. My prayers go with you and I for one will not forget.
I just watched a powerful video, thanks to a post from TL Davis at TL in Exile. It - in my opinion - is exactly what Barack Hussein Obama wants. The dream he developed at the feet of his "fathers", his mentors: Lolo Soetero, Frank Marshall Davis, Reverend Jeremiah Wright, Bill Ayers, and George Soros. His heros: V.I.Lenin, Josef Stalin, Mao Tse Tung (Mao Zedong). The dream that he shares with Michelle Obama, who also hates America, except for what she can grab in the way of fame, fortune, and expensive vacations.
If You Liked This, You Might Like (Or in this case, you might like better)…
I sell jewelry. In one show, all the jewelry vendors were located in the same area of the venue. I don't really care about the "competition" -- but other vendors also make good customers. If the vendor next to me is selling baby blankets or pottery, she is much more likely to purchase something from me than if she's selling jewelry.
“After many revisions and a couple of overhauls, at 101,600 words it was perfect,” she said. “I’d had two groups of beta readers go through it carefully and I incorporated their helpful, detailed comments.”
Overall, this compilation was a solid addition to Cpt. Bodewell’s prior release, and I can easily recommend it to any who love the music so well embraced by the vaudevillian, neo-burlesque, and steampunk communities.
As I was pushing, I heard the doctor (A totally new doctor by the way. Somewhere during my haze I guess they must have changed shifts or some such thing!) say something about tearing. I don't know exactly what she said, but I blurted out: "I don't want to be cut". Very shortly after that, my friend who was present for the birth, said: "Do you know she is cutting you". I didn't know. All I knew is my bottom was on fire and I felt like not pushing but people were yelling at me to push. All my focus was on that. I heard what my friend said, and I wanted to scream, but I didn't. I pushed. Then at 2:14am, my baby was born. Less than four hours had passed but it felt like a lifetime. Round three over.
Time Tested Beauty Tips
Regal Rose CS #105130
Because they have no stay but thine -
Bizarrely, the (acting) Archdeacon acknowledged that Mr Gowlland was ‘experienced and committed to preaching and teaching the Gospel’, but it appears that (retired) Bishop David Atkinson (and others) found him a little too committed to the cause of upholding the Church’s traditional teaching on marriage (which happens also to be the law of the land). And so he has been suspended because ‘there is a potential for division in All Saints’.
(boring, I know)
Most parents, given enough time to ponder this question, agree that the answer is “Happiness”. When offered the choice from success, money, love, fame and other things people desire, parents overwhelmingly choose happiness.
Now take the spine-sized piece of cardboard that you covered in fabric earlier and glue it down on top of the edges of the triangles that you just glued down.(You can wait until step 6 to do this, but I thought doing it now was easier and less messy.)
“Sure.” I answered.
Just as compelling is the human drama of one of our century’s greatest minds,
Overcoming these issues with good approach to the detail design work, a hydraulic system should be able to get very close to the response of a Mechanical system. However the potential of the Hydraulic solution does offer some other benefits over purely mechanical systems.
Despite laws banning cell phones while driving and increased awareness of the dangers of doing so, it’s a common fact that cell phone use while driving is still a widespread occurrence. Perhaps most discouraging to the issue is that much of this distracted driving occurs amongst young drivers, which is not only a safety concern, but also might indicate that the problem could be deeply rooted for future generations.
The final proof that my struggle to finish my education was over had arrived. Now I had the result in my hand. I felt very happy but also relieved. To finish had taken a long time.
I know that I’ll never forget. I was on a locked psychiatric ward being treated for Major Depression and addiction while these events were happening. Trust me, I remember.
The court examined its authority to grant a European injunction in the case of a Community design infringement, in application of Articles 82 and 83 of the Community Designs Regulation (EC Regulation 6/2002), following two interim decisions rendered on 9 and 16 August by the same court.
Cameron's Official Visit was a return of The Queen's hospitality last Spring, and the President toasted her Diamond Jubilee as he finished speaking.
My Mum wants me to ring the crisis team. They know too much about me and documented it wrong. They can twist anything and i’ve already pissed them off.
When the storms of life rage, shouldn’t the world be able to find refuge in the body of Christ and His church?
CJ's original recipe was also for mini mushroom pizzas as an appetizer. Party cuteness!
From my experience of Queensland, I doubted that they could find three wise men or a virgin but I guess that I was wrong.
I am really praying that we see the little flicker of a heartbeat we so long for, and that we are told our baby is a healthy little Jellybean. That is my next "goal". A good friend told me the best way to try to get through the rainbow pregnancy is to make short term "goals", so that is what I have been doing. I got my proof of pregnancy, I got on medicaid, now tomorrow my next goal will be met. First Drs appointment.
The need is urgent. Significant elements of decline in our national performance are absolute rather than relative, and the increasing performance gap between the top and bottom 20 per cent of students (currently equivalent to 5.5 years of schooling by year 9) represents an extraordinary waste of potential human capital.
It was his adviser Sosigenes who suggested abandoning the intercalary month in favour of an intercalary day once every four years. He knew that that the Julian calendar would eventually run into difficulty because the year is not exactly 365 and a quarter days long.
***GIVEAWAY for this challenge is my "All Around Christmas" stamp set that we all showcased today AND there will be a 2nd winner & it is sponsored by Custom Crops!
We're seen there on the corner... and on this day, i got the chance to share the love of my Father God with two of the million people in our city.
Football tactics have developed too, and we have been treated to some quality stuff, like Marcelo Bielsa’s Chilean team that played in the 2010 World Cup. Some of the football they played was brilliant, really made me think about the high pressing game, especially coupled with a 4-3-3 formation with a rapid front 6, they really became a neutrals favourite.
beyond you. I like to remember the way you would
I have a valiant 6 year old who loves to read and play.
Owner Joe Chirico is expanding now. The Fratelli space now bears a sign that says "Marco Polo Take Out," with brick oven pizza and panini featured. Could be a good option for neighborhood folks who don't have the time to sit down for two hours, however pleasant.
We spent a long weekend away with just our little family all cozy and nice soaking up blue skies and sunshine. How nice it was to leave behind the daily grind and kick back with loved ones :)
So, last night, he sat with us at dinner and we gave him a tablespoon of rice cereal mixed with an ounce of formula, and he liked it. Then before bed, he nursed on 1 side, cried at the other, and ate 3 ounces of a 4 ounce bottle that was 3 parts breastmilk to one part formula. (and slept from 6:30 until 3 am) And I fed him the bottle! Tommee Tippee and faster flow nipples for the win!
I started out doing genealogy the old-fashioned way. It was kind of like going big-game hunting. You had to go someplace to do it; you had to learn how to hunt; you had to plan ahead for your trip; you had to pack carefully and be prepared for anything, or nothing. It was an adventure.
People have started viewing the apartment. Our landlord isn't sure if he's selling it or continuing to rent it when we leave, which means we have a parade of real estate agents and interested renters or buyers or whatever they are tromping through at all times.
strep throat, the flu, a fever or a chill
Your love covers me
Feel free to take a look at Sweetly Scrapped Art for vintage & shabby inspired paper goods. You'll find templates, tutorials, digi stuff, free printables and much more.
I believe that what has happened in this case owes a great deal to the changed relations between the police and the media as a result of the Leveson Inquiry. A number of statements by senior officers including Mr Hogan-Howe himself, as well as a preposterous review by former parliamentary commissioner for standards Elizabeth Filkin, have insisted that police officers should be extremely wary of ever talking to the media.
The pyre was built quickly and it was Bishop himself who poured gasoline upon the wood.
This week we actually saw 3 movies as on Thursday night we went to our monthly film club and saw Rise of the Planet of the Apes. A great film which I thoroughly enjoyed. And it was good to relive walking the Golden Gate Bridge again. I was amazed that all those apes were digitally created. How can you tell what's real and what's created digitally these days?
7. Jarhead
BLITZER: A quick rebuttal from Speaker Gingrich and then Governor Romney.
2051.E/IX/11/1995. “Flag Desecration Amendment Could Make Matters Far Worse.” Chicago Sun-Times, p. 24. (Entered by Senator Paul Simon in the Congressional Record, vol. 141, p. S16676, November 3, 1995.) See Item D-IX/17/1995, above. Compare Item C-1999(8), above.
The statuesque South African actress, 34, appeared at a live auction event and gala for the group, which works to improve the overall health and living conditions of children living in poor countries.
Hyaluronic Acid – A protein found in umbilical cords and the fluids around the joints. Used in cosmetics. Alternatives: synthetic hyaluronic acid, plant oils.
I saw an opportunity to utilize their little hands and roped in the kids to help complete the bottle walls. Giving clear instructions to them, the Mantanani children - led by Idham, Fadli and little Epot formed a mini crew of bottle outsourcers, bottle washers and bottle stuffers - as we systematically filled up the walls with plastic bottles that had been found on the beach and collected by the volunteers at Camp Mantanani.
However, on one of my daughter's recent visits, she took me to a very large garden centre that I seldom get to, these days.
Like I said before as a Christian I lived my life without hiding my conditions or thoughts from my family, I never schemed, took reprisals or created strategies based on deceit and I see a world that now seems to thrive in dishonesty and half-truths.
I tried really hard to desire heels, lacy thongs and outfits that men would like. I am trying to look like Carrie, I can, and I know I can. I can look like Carrie, sparkly heels, skinny old Levis, slouchy cardigans, tousled hair Californian blonde. But it takes work, lots of work, waxing, plucking, skin bronzing, shining, protecting, make up, hair serum, endless products. Danni of the Minogue fame, states quite clearly that when you are happy you glow and attract good things to you. I need to try and be like one of the Minogue sisters, perky, manicured, preened and importantly happy. Smiling and giggling in sparkly heels. But it takes work, a stylist, lots of money, rest, a loving husband, a make up artist, hairdresser, a book deal, a perfume, an extensive wardrobe etc. I look up to my Victorian mantle and notice that my orchid is wilting, do they live forever? Can you re-pot an orchid? Prune an orchid? Then it becomes clear I can never look like Carrie or Danni or anyone else with ‘i’ or ‘ie’ name not because of money or people to help but because I am middle aged and slightly sensible; I like wearing flat shoes and baggy linen trousers, I struggle to shave my legs, I love the idea of wearing make up but unless it is tattooed on……If I had done this, transformed, twenty or even ten years ago I promise I would have endeavoured to have made much more effort but now I look more like Ellen than Carrie, more like Miranda than Danni. I ordered a linen shirt dress form M&S online, in the realistic size options fourteen and sixteen. Colour taupe, beige. I could wear it over skinny jeans, narrow jeans, or wide jeans with heels, clogs, wedges, Birkenstocks, Converse. Obviously wearing wide jeans with Converse is my preferred option. I do at least have the hair, not by design but by birth my hair is a mess; I say messy, tousled, Californian. Orchid is spelt with an ‘id’.
Pre-order from Amazon:
THE VERONICAS
The total price of the equipment I bought to make the bike more “tri” like (aerobars w/ bar tape, bar end shifters,forward seat post,tri saddle) is about $340(could have easily been more, but I found good deals on amazon.com and ebay). I will mention that the Transition Elite AL doesn’t have an aero seat post but it is a 10 speed compared to my 9. It also has some better derailleurs, but many people will argue that derailleurs don't make that big of a difference.
For those just tuning in, I really dislike the GW Mangler Squig model soooo I have made my own out of Chaos spawn legs, green stuff and a couple of ping pong balls...
Dear Stroppy Author
Before I left the hospital, that Friday, I shared my faith with her. She was also a Christian and does many wonderful things to help others. One of those, is to spend her talent of knitting. She volunteers at a place for young mothers, teaching them this skill. I shared with her something I had learned and made, prayer shawls.
Wishing a very very happy life
If you read our pre-race post then you know that neither one of us really had a goal for this race, weeelll, we aren’t fully capable of just making a race an easy/laid back/casual race. There is very much a competitive edge that lives on in each of us. Plus as the temperatures are staring to go up and bring us the hot weather goals for a race can change in our minds in an instance.
good from the overdrawn.
To Wisconsin, Iowa, Minnesota, to sing their songs, (they are
2. Link us on your blog by putting our SBU banner/image anywhere on your blog. Just copy the code that we
Snow is an old school, sarcastic quipping action-hero, I heard him likened to Bruce Willis in a review by Mark Kermode, and I think that’s quite accurate. The profanity and toughness he shows in this flick does have echoes of what I think is one of Willis’ best movies The Last Boy Scout.
It was just meant to help while away the time.
Each and every day when my little ones hop off of the bus and come running in through the front door, they take off all their gear and give their mama some major hugs! That's my favorite part. And then they take out piles and piles of paperwork. Piles. And more piles. It's like crazy amounts of papers each and every day.
Meanwhile, from Australia…
Here's the video. I must warn you: if you are sensitive, it's not a good idea to watch this. Don't worry, there's no blood or open wounds (that's what I thought the first time someone posted this video and when I read the comments)
Folders 3$ worth
Embrace the emotions
One of my very worst habits, hands down, is Starbucks. The most ironic thing about having a Starbucks location just a few steps away from the front door of my office building is that we brew our own fresh coffee at the office multiple times throughout the day, and I even bring in my own selection of teas. But at various points throughout the day, each and every day, I begin to feel that tug and pull calling me downstairs to go and visit Starbucks. Even though I will admit I’m not a huge fan of the quality of their coffee, I will say there’s something special about the experience. What then, lies at the very core of this addiction?
'Today, my mother followed me to work to see what I got up to. I'm a fitness instructor in a ground floor gym that has big windows overlooking the street. She stood outside and waved at me for half an hour, while I tried to concentrate on teaching a visibly amused class'.
12:00: C has lunch, usually yogurt, cheese and crackers, fruit etc.
Bible already says, “Only a fool would say ‘There is no God’…” (Psalm 53:1
What do you think? I am going to paint them in white and patinate them.
I just found out that two cards were removed from my shop because the attorney for Dr. Seuss Enterprises objected to my use of a quote from Dr. Seuss. I had given credit for the quote, not claiming it to be my own. I'm more than a little annoyed by this. It's a quote I had heard before and found online on various quote compilation sites. Seriously, do you not have anything better to do with your time than hunt down things like this and complain? If I had not given credit to the author of the quote, I would understand. I guess I'm just frustrated by the idea that you can lay claim to everything someone said.
When people find out that I have film degree one of the many questions I get asked is ‘What’s your all time favourite film?’ or ‘Could you recommend me a good film?’ The first is easy to answer. The Lion King. The second is always so much trickier, mainly because the films I recommend are good to me, but others can’t stand them. So for this guest blog I thought I’d tackle what, to me makes a good film.
BELT: Dorothy Perkins.
While this chatter was happening in my head, out of my non-religious mouth flowed words in a chant or prayer I’ve never said before.
Really though, besides being made as (somewhat) merely a precursor for the upcoming The Avengers movie (the eventual centerpiece bringing all of the Marvel Studios Universe together in one great big makeshift Cosmic Cube), the Kenneth Branagh directed Thor (and it really should have been called The Mighty Thor, but that is just a one-time fanboy's piffling argument) is a fine piece of action cinema. Even though Branagh's directing style is basically a non-style (the fact that the director had to compensate for transfer into 3D and therefore could not do too many tricks with his camera, only adds to Branagh's lack of auteurial signature) and his expected Shakespearean bent leaves a bit (but just a bit) to be desired (Darker Kenneth! Go darker!) the movie barrels along with a certain vim and vigor (and a mightily mythical bravado) that suits the history of the
Through our adoption journey- I lost who I was. I lost the goals I had set for MY life. I left behind MY dreams and MY personal plans and I took on His. I believe God used our adoption experience to accomplish this.
And then reveal that it is a part of this odd sculpture in Seattle's Olympic Sculpture Garden.
As a Sales Professional, you have to sell the product, the Dealership and YOU!!!!
I didn’t do well practicing my race day preparations. I forgot to check my Gu supply until the morning of the race. I had only one packet, but needed two for a 13 mile race. I was hoping that, like last year, Gu would be handing out samples at around mile 9.5. I was in luck. Gu wasn’t there, but Honey Stinger was and I got the energy boost I needed for the last half of the race.
On Christ the solid Rock I stand,
That’s why immediately Homo Sapiens can go to 4.0 on Dianetics: The Modern Science of Mental Health and the Science of Survival. But he can’t go anyplace above that without having his self-determinism restored to him. (emphasis in bold supplied). He becomes well, he becomes better able to reason, but I have not seen what I had hoped to see, because unfortunately it can’t exist — an ethical, strong Homo Sapiens. And if it can’t exist, let’s go up here.
For the most part, men have not had too much to say about the changes in the law but according to Evarist Kalish MP, a member of the Liberal party and the chair of parliament’s human rights committee, many men recognise that women may provide the best leadership.
13 It was not through the law that Abraham and his offspring received the promise that he would be heir of the world, but through the righteousness that comes by faith. 14 For if those who depend on the law are heirs, faith means nothing and the promise is worthless, 15 because the law brings wrath. And where there is no law there is no transgression.
Some great little tables though and I know you all have been asking for those! And of course ladders, boxes and chairs are always on our shopping list!!
Steam the aubergines by peeling, chopping roughly, and microwaving in a covered bowl for 8 minutes until limp. Discard any water in the bowl, then purée the aubergines with an immersion/stick blender. While still hot, add the chocolate and stir until melted. Let cool.
*No news yet, but I'll keep you posted!
Happy Monday to you !!
If you didn't get to see her visit to The Land of Living Skies, please check Beth's post HERE. (It's not every day you get to see a groundhog in a Mountie's hat, and you will love the deal she and Beth struck!)
A informal chance to share a beer and chat with Australia's best brewers!
Celebrate your green fingers with this "World's Greatest Orchid Grower" pink orchid mug. Great product for lovers of orchids and gardening. Artwork adapted from an original fine art watercolour painting by Sarah Trett.
While this is important to me you should buy the brand that has the best fit for you.
Keep the heat at the lowest and keep stirring even after the dhal becomes thick.
Nevertheless, Jackson says the war was wrong because it was cloaked in lies.
Anyway, food for thought I hope. C’mon, take five minutes and list the things you are grateful for in your life. You may find more things popping into your head once you have started listing them. Jot those down on your list, too.
Philip noticed that he still used a French word in an affected way when an English one would have served.”
Here is a break down, of the posts that Pilgrim (one of Joan Wheeler’s imaginary friends) said, on the thread on adoptive families circle. This exercise is to show how these figmentational characters are, all one and the same, Joan Wheeler. It is IMPOSSIBLE for another human being to use the same words and expressions of ANOTHER and claim to be a SECOND person. This is a rather long post, but ever so informative, please stay with it.
A new article by Dr. Joseph Kuhn of the Department of Surgery at Baylor University Medical Center, appearing in the peer-reviewed journal Baylor University Medical Center Proceedings, poses a number of challenges to both chemical and biological evolution. Titled “Dissecting Darwinism,” the paper begins by recounting some of the arguments raised during the Texas State Board of Education debate that challenged chemical and biological evolution. Those challenges include:
She talked about his cute behavior. When he is back from drinking, he does back-hug her in the kitchen and he sits at wine bar with his legs swinging up and down talking to her until she finishes her kitchen works. There is no son being like this? She said to him and he just smiled at her. When she changed her hair a bit and no one even noticed, he would be the one to know and he would ask “You did something with your hair, right? It’s beautiful. Where did u do it? And that was so cute of him.
Put some mixture in canning jars with the directions, a cute note, and a ribbon for a great Christmas gift!
HAPPY BIRTHDAY MY SWEETEST FRIEND!! I love you sooooo much!
The straighteners are just a bit smaller than the classic GHD straighteners and are very light weight which is perfect if carrying in your handbag or hand luggage. In the box it also came with two batteries (one is a backup), charging stand, international plugs and an adapter to charge in the car. I was extremely impressed that you are provided with a back up battery, and with 1 hour battery life in each, this should be plenty of charge life for the trip....I hope! The straightener comes with 3 different heat setting's 150, 180 and 200. As I use GHD's everyday I will probably be OK just using the hottest heat setting. Charging is also very simple as all you do is stand it in the charging unit, the straightener flashes when it is fully charged (and it even comes with a small compartment for the extra battery to charge at the same time).
The facility is a state of the art “grass root” refinery run as a subsidiary of ONGC. It has been praised for its “versatile design“ and its “high flexibility to process Crudes of various API and with high degree of Automation.“
AMAAAAAZING.
My suggestion would be for the Maryland Courts to rethink their stance. Nothing good ever comes from singling out a group or breed.
In my pre-child days (which seems like EONS ago!) I was convinced that I would never plop my kids in front of the TV as an easy distraction. Even when Little S was a baby, we tried our hardest to shield her from the hypnotizing effects of the TV. We were successful until she was about a 1 1/2 years old. That’s when we realized that the TV had an unsurpassed ability to keep her in one spot & out of trouble while we got things done around the house.
It was a sunny day when they laid my father to rest, as if even the skies couldn't hide a smile. Just like my aunt, my mother's sister come in from the prairie country with a couple of cousins. Her face was pinched from the effort of holding her lips in place.
Would you stop the seasons,
Another light swat with the flogger hit her on the other leg. Like a swarm of little bee stings, the sensation spread, and she squirmed when her clit contracted in response, and more of her juices ran down her leg.
Revelation 15
And start finding a rainbow in the late afternoon;
Don't you love the expression on Brighton's face?
be saved
I did tell my daughter, just for laughs, “And you can’t sell the Rosie O’Donnell Barbie in the box.” I made her keep that doll in the box, because “it was going to be worth something some day.” Ok, maybe when hell freezes over.
But, I improved, tackling pancake recipe after pancake recipe. I found what I believe to be the greatest pancakes ever and I usually make those over and over again, with lots of chocolate chips. Now I've come to believe that I've found the greatest pumpkin pancakes.
Happy Friday everyone! We girls here at Elizabeth & Co. are in the middle of a crazy tag sale weekend. But I'm lucky enough to be two places at once today, because I'm also guest posting over at Primitve & Proper. If you follow along, then you already know that I'm a huge fan of Cassie's work. But even better than that, we have become real life friends. How cool is that!
The participating breweries:
Features of social organisation such as networks, norms, and social trust that facilitate coordination and cooperation for mutual benefit (p. 67).
I took two days off -necessary R&R, because the writing I have chosen to do is very intense - both strands, in different ways. So, ten days on which I wrote during the morning, and the evening. Most days, I went for a walk in the afternoon, either down to the strand, or up to the mountaintop above Mountain MIne at Allihies.
Wow, I need help.
I have never been so nervous in my life. But the speech seemed to go well. At least they let me keep the bull!
After a bathroom remodel I needed a new piece of artwork for the now newly painted walls and I didn’t want to spend a fortune for a piece of art. So of course I was just starting to get the pinterest thing. I was like huh I just pinned something that would look great in my bathroom. A totally easy looking silhouette canvas. Here’s where I got the idea from http://tatertotsandjello.com/2011/07/summer-social-guest-project-make-mod.html . It is super easy and It looks professionally done. Who knew the most unartistic person could be an artist.
Look I also support the whole use of extensions, but it is lost on the masses that have not even a clue what an extension is. And that is a shame.
"Bloody squirrels," he said as he headed to the garage for his gardening gloves and a trowel.
I don't care if you don't have a faith to follow.
Back in July of 2003 I was in a major car accident. My sister was driving, my brother was in the passenger seat, two friends were on either side of me, and I was in the middle back seat. Let me recap here what I can remember of this event. I do not remember that day. I do not remember the week before. I have a lot of black spots and most of the details I have came after from people telling me, but there is one thing I will never forget about the accident.
So funny and so true! Did I catch one of your kids sneaking in a "That's what she said" at the end? Hysterical.
My favorite part of the parrillada, though, was the morcilla, South American blood sausage. Now, I'm something of a blood sausage junkie, but this morcilla was all I ask for in a blood sausage, with a firm, deep black casing giving way to smooth as edible velvet meat mixed with bits of fat. The flavor was deep and intense but quite mild. This quickly becomes one of my favorite, if not my favorite morcilla in LA.
I practiced my scales and the music that I had, even the proper hand positions. Violin is a very complicated instrument because there are no frets like there are on the guitar. We as violin players have to truly develop a good ear, because we have to put our fingers precisely in the correct position on the violin or we are either too high or too low on the note.
Dominion, which has been rightly criticized for reaping excessive profits from its electricity rates, at least has put this money to a worthy cause.
Added to that, Najib uses the “Malay race” as his shield to protect UMNO from losing power, that is “if UMNO loses power the Malays will lose power”. But the people are mindful that there is no basis for this fear. The political reality today is that the Malays are represented in both Barisan Nasional and Pakatan Rakyat.
And I write out this
“We understand that our customers come from a variety of backgrounds, experiences, lifestyles, and cultures and we respect their individual decisions to choose the television programs that they deem acceptable for themselves and their families. Consumers speak most loudly when they vote with their remote control and change the channel or turn off the TV if a program does not fit their personal criteria.”
1 Timothy 6:6 Yet true godliness with contentment is itself great wealth.
Lead singer and keyboards for blur
278 7. Book Review: Stephen L. Carter, Integrity (New York: Basic Books, 1996). The Great Ideas Today, vol. 1996, pp. 464-46 (Encyclopedia Britannica, 1996). (This book review was originally commissioned by the American Bar Association Journal, which found it could not use it. Its original title was, “How Not to Use the Great Books.")
My absentee ballot for the Republican presidential primary came in the mail today. I read it carefully because that's what the instructions told me to do, and I am an obedient subject of the greatest democracy on earth. Instruction #3 tells me to "Mark only the number of choices as indicated on the ballot."
sucked into
My eyes are a little squiffy at the moment, following a cataract op, which limits my time on the computer just now, so please excuse me if I just nominate the following eight blogs for the Versatile Blogger Award, as selecting fifteen would send me cross-eyed.
I was by now beginning to regret this initiative: the educational value was somewhat limited; I had lost control of the class; and there now seemed to be items of clothing randomly flying through the air. What’s more, no matter how easy it is to take off a jumper or remove a shoe, putting them back on again according to manufacturers’ instructions seemed to be beyond the powers of any of these kids – trainers were now being used as offensive weapons and one particular idiot was cat-walking around the back of the classroom, his jumper being used like some grotesquely styled leggings.
This is a mummy we made using an empty pickle jar and cheese cloth I cut into strips then hot glued to the jar. H wrapped it and told me where she wanted me to glue. Then we attached googly eyes to the jar.
We have given up being part of a steadfast community. Yes, I know that cruiser's have their own community, and I love participating in it. But let's face it. We are all water gypsies. We come and go, move here and there. You often don't even know when the last time you will see someone is. One minute they're in the next anchorage over, and the next minute they're off to Timbuktu. Or vice versa. It's a very transient life and if you are truly cruising around yourself, you never have coffee with the same friend two weeks in a row. That's cruising. I miss having friends that you see every week and know what's going on, and have over for dinner every Thursday, month after month.
Lake County deputies Tuesday arrested the couple — she’s 59, he’s 64 — and charged them with plotting to hire a hit man to kill their son’s wife, 10-year-old daughter, his 16-year-old stepdaughter and 14-year-old stepson and the family dog.
Adapted from le livre des fours secs et moelleux de pierre herme
It's going to be interesting to see what becomes of California in 20 years time when the Hispanic population is the majority. Will we see the same thing that happened to places like Detroit, where the Whites leave in droves and leave the state to the less educated population who most likely don't pay taxes and live off the welfare system?
Breakfast: Special K Fruit Crisps (100 calories), Special K Snack bar (90 calories), Gatorade (130 calories)=320 calories
The current annual Idea Book & Catalog ends on May 31st
And this is why I will be thinking and talking a whole lot more about this in coming days and weeks now that I am back home.
And yet there's something I want to note here--maybe so I can help myself believe and hope.
Despite its protective properties, the denial of our animal nature can have serious costs for health and well-being. Reminders of mortality have been shown, for example, to decrease women's intentions to conduct breast self-examinations, and might also fuel body objectification, which is known to damage mental health. Not only can this denial hurt our health, but it may undermine our very humanity and sense of aliveness. As Becker put it, "The irony of man's condition is that the deepest need is to be free of the anxiety of death and annihilation; but it is life itself which awakens it, and so we must shrink from being fully alive" (cited in Goldenberg et al., 2009).
I am popping in to tell you that I will be checked out from the blog sphere for a short while.
This is the view from our holiday home - looking over some of the Whitsunday Islands, back towards mainland Australia. Can you see the dark patches in the water?? That is just a small part of the coral reefs that are all throughout the area!
And negatory on the cost of this mow-chine there RED RYDER
This was the first time making a dark roux, that fat-flour combo that is associated with dishes such as gumbo and etouffee. The roux took about 20 minutes to go from the color of milk chocolate to the shade of, say, a darker Nestle Crunch bar (so not much). That’s when I added the onion out of sheer impatience. I’d been standing at the stove for about 30 minutes, whisking the bottom of the pot to keep the flour from sticking too much. Once I added the finely chopped onion, the roux bubbled furiously. It didn’t settle until I removed the pot from the heat and added the chopped bell pepper and celery and spice mixture. I scrubbed the sides and bottom of the pot with a wooden flat-edged spoon like a fiend, fearing the mixture would cake onto the pot so much as to render dishwashing a monumental effort.
Jerry Jeff Walker
This little light of mine
Light therapy, or phototherapy, is the administration of doses of bright light in order to treat a variety of sleep and mood disorders. It is most commonly used to re-regulate the body’s internal clock and/or relieve depression.
WORD PROCESSING: I recommend Pages, for general word processing and small research presentation. Click here for more information about this app.
* Children's Writer's & Illustrator's Market annual guide. Keep in mind, though, that this is not an all-inclusive list. (Check your library if you don't want to buy it.)
“Anything is possible”, said Betty. “Did he really stop playing the “Erotica Felina” with you?”
This is no longer an Arab spring about democracy and human rights. Its a world wide cover up to distract everyone’s attention on life threatening issues. Russia is an oil producer just like Saudi Arabia and they have shown great support to the Assad regime while not showing any support to other Arab countries. China also supports Assad, and both countries have vetoed UN resolutions against Syria while Europe is focused on the middle east to cover up their own economical problems and the US arent completely honest about their stand against Iran. So if you really think about it, the middle east is the center of a major war that will happen some time but the question is when it will actually happen.
It’s taken me a while but I’m writing Three and finishing this series if it kills me. I’m giving myself until the end of the week. Lezzzzdooodeeeezzz!!!
I ask, "So where were you when Bush went to war? I don't remember seeing you out here then, protecting the Constitution."
Gov. Chris Christie is taking $65 million, the entire allocation, from the state’s global warming fund, and $5.9 million, from the toxic waste site cleanup program, to help close the over $10 billion deficit in his $29.3 billion 2010-11 state budget, the state environmental protection commissioner said Monday.
L’Oreal Studio Line Styling $0.75/1
I would like to see the teacher unions asking one post-budget question: why have there been no cuts in the OFSTED budget? Less pressure form this self-serving body can only result in happier teachers, more settled schools, and an improved education service for all.
“They’ve kinda helped me understand the situation. Coping with it is something entirely different,” the police officer said. “The pain’s still there. I don’t know if it’ll ever truly be gone. I think it’ll get less and less worse until maybe one day I’ll wake up and it’s not there anymore – but that day is still far away.”
The use of antidepressants and other psychotropic drugs — those that affect brain chemistry — has skyrocketed over the last decade. Adult use of antidepressants almost tripled between the periods 1988-1994 and 1999-2000. Between 1995 and 2002, the most recent year for which statistics are available, the use of these drugs rose 48 percent, the CDC reported.”
Apologies to those of you working today. I'm off to Kelvingrove Art Gallery with the family and maybe a wee visit to Oxfam Music and then Heart Of Buchanan on Byres Rd. But we won't mention that to L just yet!
Bomb damage was the excuse . But If one needs to see what can be done Visit Prague or Belgrade and even Dresden. Prague they say is beautiful Building wise. And of course some of our market towns. Will we destroy these modern edifaces to the corruption of the NWO. well somewhere down the line maybe. But more pressing needs will be dealt with first. is my bet.
You take her to a movie you like (-2)
2 tablespoons rice wine vinegar
12.I Objectify
Oprah does it again.
For only the third time in the eight years I've known her, I lie to her.
I know I'll have much more to say, but the visit left me feeling empty. Alex firmly believes at this point that everything was clearly her fault and that she needs to heal from all the pain. She parroted back many things in her wording, things that didn't come from her own thinking. It was painful and sad to experience.
Writing for someone else is a lot harder than you can think it is. They request certain things, they ask for everything and expect it to be done…
Another popular formula is Calvinism, which has always been to me so unbelievably out there, perhaps because I didn’t grow up among it. It shocks me when I find people who actually believe this. It’s kind of an ego/hubris thing, at least for many. Calvinists seem to think they are special because God chose them. In their way of thinking, Jesus didn’t die for everyone, just those Whom He chose, the elect, and God will be faithful to complete His work in them no matter how they respond, as long as they are truly chosen.
One thing I did get accomplished for the holidays is ordering my Christmas cards...finally!! I'm actually even 'early' this year. Normally I don't get them ordered until well after Thanksgiving because that's when I get the pictures taken for them. A few weeks ago my sil came up and took some family pictures and pictures of the boys. We have never had family pictures taken, how crazy is that?!
I honestly have no clue where I got this CD. I do know however I bought it because Day At The Fair was on it. And it also introduced me to Big D & The Kids Table. By the sounds of it, I think the Big D song is possibly a demo version. Released in 2004 on, yep, Springman Records. There was no catalog number that I can see, and I have no idea how many were made.
You are my paradise, my peponi.
This is a game where exploring and doing side quests *feels* like the main game. The sense of freedom is intoxicating. Want to become skilled in magic and learn to raise the dead to fight for you? Then ignore the main quest marker and head north for The College Of Winterhold.
So yesterday evening I just googled "making crochet bows" and I came acrossed this lovely little pattern for small crocheted bows here.
Cradock pleaded guilty to using a phone for a fictitious purpose and was sentenced to 75 hours community work.
If only this weren't completely personal.......
Should you be concerned about this quiet chatter that dies each time your return from your morning ‘coffee’ break, then perhaps you might want to try and pretend to act sober. This is difficult, though achievable. First, you have to walk into the office at speed, with purposeful strides. Drunks tend to swagger. If you have ever seen a veteran senator exit a late night caucus session, you will know what this swagger looks like. Secondly, try to refrain from explaining where you have been and what you have been doing. People with a guilt free conscience never feel the need to explain themselves voluntarily. When you do speak, don’t use complicated words. Speak in single syllables. Practice this for 30 minutes every day. Refrain from discussing politics. People are always far more opinionated when drunk. Stick to lightweight topics such as the latest episode of The Big Bang Theory. If you are discussing evening television, this will mask the fact that you have actually been out drinking the previous night. If you haven’t seen an episode of The Big Bang Theory, here is a generic plot:
You would expect Robert Downey Jr to paint you red with blush instead the Iron man and his annoyance paints you red with anger.
"You can't have any pudding if you don't eat yer meat."
What is it like to be a swallow on a wire?
Nigel Reo-Coker: After making the move to Wanderers last summer on a free transfer Reo-Coker might be off again. The Championship would serve no purpose to Reo-Coker when only better clubs await him.
“Yes, but I can explain. You see, that nasty postman was here again. He keeps coming into the yard, and spraying that awful pepper spray at us. We were no where near the fence. In fact, Isaac was asleep under the pine tree down back, and I was on the lower porch, surveying my Kingdom. When all of a sudden, for absolutely no reason, that awful man, after putting the mail in the box, which as you know, is up there beside the road. He sneaks down the driveway, and begins spraying that toxic matter into the wind, so it drifts toward me, stinging my eyes, burning my nose, and leaving a disgusting taste in my mouth. Well, I just couldn’t take it anymore. I leapt from the porch, raced toward the gate, and just as I was about to jump over it, he turned and ran, an obvious admission of guilt if you ask me. But, wanting to be sure he knew the fence is only here to protect myself, and Isaac, and to deter intruders from trespassing, I lifted the latch on the gate. At which time, he jumped into that silly vehicle he drives, and sped away. It was all really quite comical.”
Meanwhile, the two Hobbits were both delighted and terrified as the monster below continuing bellowing insanely as the flames crept along his clothing and caught his hair on fire.
"With its geographic spread and long history, Islamic art was inevitably subject to a wide range of regional and even national styles and influences as well as changes within the various periods of its development. It is all the more remarkable then that, even under these circumstances, Islamic art has always retained its intrinsic quality and unique identity. Just as the religion of Islam embodies a way of life and serves as a cohesive force among ethnically and culturally diverse peoples, the art produced by and for Muslim societies has basic identifying and unifying characteristics. Perhaps the most salient of these is the predilection for all-over surface decoration. The four basic components of Islamic ornament are calligraphy, vegetal patterns, geometric patterns, and figural representation....from the seventh to the nineteenth century."
2. Rabbit Hole - Sucked
I was lying in bed (of course!) and looking up pregnancy books on my iPad (iBooks).
This is the interesting bit and the exact thing I said before the game. Although I used the word Will rather then is and how,
I used the cool plane and sentiment from Travel Time. I overlapped my planes in an attempt to give them some movement - not sure it that's worked as I've used different inks, but I'm a sucker for this yellow and grey combo (it's so on trend right now!)
Which has tested us but we’ll get by.
Lysimachia has a reputation for healing eye ailments, and is said to be able to restore sight in certain conditions. Some practitioners say it is superior to eye-bright for these purposes. It is recommended as a treatment for macular degeneration.
I will never be without Kerstin Florian Spa Face Aromatherapy Neroli Water. Love it! I just spritzed myself:) Think MAC Fix+ (but better IMO) in a better bottle too.
o Promotion – Theatrical trailers, TV spots, one sheet
Yo-Yo-Dyne Propulsion Systems: Reno Division - Rachael has worked tirelessly promoting my campaign and has added a button to my blog on her blog.
“We need to stand up for our rights,” IT said. “And that’s what I’m doing. I’m not doing anything for myself, as much as transsexuals who follow after me, trying to transition.”
Jenny Rough: A lawyer-turned-writer whose articles and essays have appeared in a range of publications, including AARP The Magazine, More, The Washington Post, Whole Living, and Yoga Journal.
Ah yes indeed...I cast a furtive and slightly panicky look round. It's funny how you can see immediately those in the know and can read exactly what they think from their faces.
Make the jar into frit. Turing a jar into frit is a fancy way of saying I broke the jar into tiny pieces that I could use to fuse into another shape. The technique requires a hammer and something to catch the small pieces. I use a box constructed of wood. After cleaning the glass, I put the glass into a plastic bag to keep the glass clean. I place the glass into the wood box and then hit the glass with an old, heavy sledge hammer until the glass is the size I want.
Hello, Dear Readers. Today, I have some apologies to make.
But that wasn’t the manuscript I sold.
As our nominee, Mitt Romney would keep the focus on Obama's failed policies... Romneycare is a problem for Romney, but not an insurmountable one. I think Romney will do a much better job of exposing Obama as a radical leftist than Santorum ever could, mainly because Santorum is too eager to let himself get lured into lecturing us about things like Satan, sodomy, pornography, contraception, and whether or not Protestants are real Christians.
I realized I have never blogged about this book. It is a treasure of space art with some beautiful color paintings.
It is loved from within, its nectar sustained
This is actually the second cover in the All Stars series, the first one was by the super talented Lindsay Hornsby. I didn't try to match her art style, but did use her color palette. It was strange seeing the color choices that another artist used and thinking about how I would have done it differently. The two biggest differences are that her skin tone is very yellow while mine leans more toward reddish orange. And the over all tone is purple, where I usually go with a dark blue or red.
“Lacking any compelling evidence of net harm to society from correcting misperceptions of the relative risk between cigarettes and snus, the human right for the individual to receive accurate information about options to reduce risk should prevail. Going beyond the no-safe-tobacco message to provide better informa¬tion … is necessary to respect the individual right to health relevant information and smokers’ autonomy and may also—as our study indicates—result in increased quit rates for cigarette smoking. Some have argued that failure to disseminate infor¬mation about reduced risks for fear that population nicotine use may increase could be regarded as paternalism and create public mistrust of health messages about tobacco use. To prevent uptake of snus among youth, public health and tobacco control professionals could use other methods than withholding information about relative risks, including taxation, restrictions, and information campaigns aiming to change the cultural symbolism of snus use…Devising a way to inform smokers about the risk contin¬uum of tobacco products (without anyone decoding this infor¬mation as snus being risk free) should be an important research priority in countries where snus is allowed to compete with cigarettes for market share.”
Anyone who objects to Bartlett's proposed fussbucketing is welcome, and there is a Facebook event set up HERE for inviting like-minded friends. Although we're meeting initially in a bar, let's hope enough turn up to spill into an impromptu street party.
Day 10: (Platelets 112,000)
Mash Salt Additions
There is a school of psychology that believes that cognitive processes are shaped by the body, rather than the other way around. Yoga is enough to convince me of that.
My balcony – I love looking out onto the blue-grey Parisien rooftops whilst the sunsets, with beer in hand.
Fly! You have no idea how much I fought not to have an exclamation mark in the title! I think I traded it off in the end to be able to call the album 'LoveTel Motel' or something along those lines. Dunno. It seems like years ago now. Most people that I know who have heard the album or own a copy of it cite Fly! as being the best track on the album. But it has been described by some as nothing but just a piece of pure pub rock. It was the first song that we ever wrote as a band together in the rehearsal room. We had the vibe of the melody, and I was filling in for our singer Keith Spouncer who had left for the first time (You Only Leave Twice in Magic Ship Meeeeeeeeeister Bond) before we recorded it (it was also the first song that we ever recorded) and I had the general meter of the lyric and even the first couple of lines such as "Got a girl, she's a friend of mine, ain't seen her in a long long time." The session ended and I recall saying to the lads 'not to worry' and that I'd have 'a lyric for knocked up' for it within the next week. I like a bit of pressure. That motivates me. So I was on a train, that was very delayed, and I am going quietly mad wishing that I was home with my family. I was missing my missus and my kids who were going up to bed and I was stuck in the middle of the country going nowhere. What to do but get my magic pencil out and work on that lyric. So it became a song - mostly - about a bloke trying to get home to his woman, anyway he can. Preferably by flying because I was wishing that I had chosen to fly, or drive or even taken a boat rather than to be stuck on that bloody train. I chose not to reflect the negative aspect in the lyric though and included the reference to 'Midnight Train' which was about me being so very late. By the time I eventually got back home from my trip I had pretty much nailed that lyric. When we got together the following week it just flowed and the song was wrapped before we had even started. It was a great feeling to watch that particular song come together. The singer returned after an ill advised flounce and I had to hand it over. We cut it at our first session with him singing it, but I always felt that I could have done a better job of singing it than him. Little did I know that I was going to get my chance! We chose to put Fly! first on the album because it has something about it that has a kind of 'bounce' factor and people say that they really like it. While it's not high art, I think that it is nevertheless a very good, catchy pop song. You ought to try writing something catchy that comes in at just 2.43 secs! We did pretty well in the end I think.
"ma-ya" (maya)
This week, our challenge is TAG YOU'RE IT ! We would like to see you either using a tag in your creation or making a tag - whatever grabs your crafty fancy !
001:002 And the earth was without form, and void; and darkness was
I talk to the couple and asked if they have an online store but, they don’t. However, I have their phone number and email address for y’all in case you want to buy anything. They will gladly ship to you. I told them that I was going to do this post and they were happy to have me give out this information.
I told Ate Liz I wanted a bikini wax. What it means is that she'll only be taking off hair from the bikini line but still save some in the inner portion of the vajay. Unlike the brazilian wax, where everything is taken off (even the hair in the buttocks and anus area!), a bikini wax doesn't hurt that much. It is suggested for waxing virgins that they go for the bikini wax on their first session and if they're ready after a couple more appointments, they can go on to getting a brazilian.
Flourishes Timeless Tuesday challenge this week is this fall picture:
Giveaway Rules:
When I started blogging eons ago, I never imagined that I would be asked to be a guest blogger. I have seen many of my blog buddies guest post and was always secretly envious.
Here we go, countdown to unavoidable stress begins when I hit publish – 5, 4, 3, 2, 1 – No looking back, here I go!
Today I woke up to the cacophonous twitterings of winged creatures outside my window. They were reveling in the light drizzle that fell from the overcast sky, parrying for the perfect puddles, wrestling for the wriggliest worms. I determined to write something beautiful and eloquent for this glorious Monday morning.
One Year Sober!
Following dreams (at any age) is something we should all aspire to do whether it’s for our own personal lives or for business.
Official inquiries into the incident and cause for the disaster never yielded definitive resolution. The previous government in South Africa, lead by the National Party, was either grossly incompetent in its fact-finding mission or deliberately obstructive. Then there is also the part played by the ANC. One “official” cause supplied was that a fire caused by fireworks on board resulted in the disaster.
In case any of you are left reading, I'm up in Portland for the week. I'm kinda art directing my best friends wedding this weekend and my friend Chelsea (from Frolic fame) is styling and executing the tabletops. and she is awesome.
This herb is the level of testosterone in a whole new level, with whom he has a big popularity among men, increases in body building asTestosterone means better performance and additional weight without side effects, such as caused by harmful steroids.
They had six open spot acts last night, five of which were good. The odd thing was that the other act was not funny and failed in every possible way but, strangely, was the most interesting of them all. If he ever figures out what his act, what his schtick, is… he will be fascinating to watch. I think I am quite good at talent spotting. There was talent in his eyes and talent in the way he said what he said but, sadly not in what he said.
But the father said to his servants, ‘Quick! Bring the best robe and put it on him. Put a ring on his finger and sandals on his feet. Bring the fattened calf and kill it. Let’s have a feast and celebrate. For this son of mine was dead and is alive again; he was lost and is found.’ So they began to celebrate.
7. "I know what it's like to unleash the beast."
The more questing soul.*
(7) The Livingston-Penn Minimum during cycles 24 and 25 (the decreased solar activity forecast in their 2006 paper, for which they won the Nobel Prize). The resulting global cooling, intensified by the eruption of Katla, would have created horrific crop failures and famine if not for the earlier warming. The replacement of fossil fuels with fusion and solar stabilized CO2 levels.
While the game is still a ways away, six new characters from all three development houses have been unveiled, adding to Project X Zone’s already impressive roster.
Label free to help protect baby’s delicate skin
1pm Bev "The Beer" Robins
Here's what Tessa had to say about her time on the 2011 SRM Stickers Design Team; "I count being a part of the SRM team in 2011 as one of my greatest blessings of the year. It has been an amazing experience. Susan has been an absolute dream to work for. She is caring, encouraging, and oh-so-thoughtful. Jenyfur has been a magnificent team coordinator and cheerleader. Every member of the design team was kind, supportive and inspiring. Just to be associated with these gals has been a huge boost to my crafty morale and creativity. I am most grateful for the friendships that have grown here. I am also grateful for the amazing product that I was able to work with. SRM cannot be beat in quality or versatility, which makes SRM Stickers my go-to product for just about any crafty endeavor I take on. SRM will forever have a place in my crafty heart :)."
But thanks to these friends, even though I stopped displaying my relationship status on facebook years ago, I know they've added some options over the years. Out of curiosity, I looked at the options the other day. The choices, in no particular order:
"Um...Matt?"
she stands by any car and wails
As I turn to walk inside, I feel your touch. I melt into your skin, my soul is lost without you, this is too much. My fears arise. Now I want to turn around to see who touched me. Was it you?
Standing in a line of over 200 people at 7 am in San Diego, California during a very cold and windy morning; I thought back to when I first saw the, now famous, post-credit Iron Man scene where Sam Jackson playing Nick Fury uttered the word “Avengers.” Who knew that one word would lead to this, in my opinion, the greatest comic book film I’ve yet to see. Allow me to explain.
And did you know that some people can’t taste the banana flavor? I learned this from one blogger’s firsthand experience with the inability to taste the chemical that gives bananas their particular flavor, but I’ll be damned if I can find that blog now!
If you combine the Billboard Top-100 Charts and the Billboard Mainstream Rock Charts, David Lee Roth charted 19 singles, while Sammy Hagar charted 28 singles.
Just a couple of random things that rocked my world yesterday.
I have always felt that God has something in store for us that is a little different than the norm because of our daughter. If you have ever met Ella, you noticed her joyful, sweet spirit, but also sensitive spirit. She is a very compassionate child and very intuitive. Rarely misbehaving, but constantly striving to be pleasing to us. We've always noticed this, and I have always thought about what God could have for us by giving us a child with these characteristics. Over the past year, as this plan has been unfolding, it has become obvious why this strength and compassion has been in her since the beginning. God has been equipping us for the past 4 years and we had no idea!
And got everything that he had ever wanted;
It's not a new book, but I missed it when it came out in the late '90's. I think I picked it up at McKay's, Knoxville's big second hand bookstore, but I think now that I've read it, it's a "must have". And it does have recipes--excellent ones. They are all very simple, but elegant. All using very fresh ingredients, perfectly seasoned and clearly influenced by Allende's Chilean heritage. Nothing too heavy, but everything fraught with suggestion. Also very basic--so it's an excellent book for newlyweds who can't boil water, bachelors looking to impress the objects of their affections and 20-somethings lost in the kitchen. And so much fun to read.
2. In a large bowl, combine all of the ingredients, except the meat, breadcrumbs and egg.
Josh: No. Robots aren't people. They're metal.
Apple Inc. was established in April of 1976 as Apple Computer, Inc.. The company had humble beginnings in the garage of one its founders, Steve Jobs. At first, the company was only known as a computer maker. Its Macintosh was the first personal computer introduced for home use. However, over the years Apple started to change and evolve. The Apple the most people know today is synonymous with devices like the iPod, iPhone, and iPad. Over the past decade, Apple has become wildly successful. Most recently, it became the most highly valued company in the world, with a current market capitalization of US$ 695 billion (Google Finance). The company currently has 357 retail locations in countries all around the world. Apple made US$ 33.8 billion in the fiscal year of 2011 while extracting US$25.9 billion in profits (Investor.Apple.com). The company does not actually manufacture any of its own products, and instead relies on outside companies to produce its designs.
Living here for almost a year, I have experiences so may things here in San Felipe. Meeting people and seeing things that you wouldn’t see anywhere else are just perks to living in a foreign country. I have met many great people that I wouldn’t have met if I hadn’t moved here. I am grateful that I had this opportunity. I now plan on traveling within life. If anyone has the chance of ever going to a Baja race, traveling to Mexico, or even traveling in general, I say go for it! It is a great life experience! Live life for yourself. Make a trip somewhere once a year. Do it for you.
The Garden Festival runs through May 19. If you are in Central Florida it would be a lovely place to visit. Great Mother’s Day Celebration.
I use crystal paperweights imported from France.
Although our telephone was fascinating, when we visited my grandparent’s in South Dakota their phone intrigued me even more. It was a wooden box that hung on the wall. The mouthpiece was black with a brass ring behind it. It had two bells on top that you could watch vibrate when the phone rang. It had no dial. Grandma lifted the earpiece, cranked the handle on the side and the operator answered. She would say something like “162W”. Well Grandma wouldn’t usually say that because that was her number. But she gave the operator the number she wished to call and waited until the desired party answered.
i can’t seem to explain why i’m capable of breaking down in the most random places, at any given time. i don’t even understand why there’s this longing ache in my heart; i shouldn’t ask for anything more. i don’t know why i put on my clothes, heels, eyeliner like they’re supposed to be some sort of protective mask from everyone around me.
I created a tag card to give to someone who might need that little push to help them start them on their way.
Miraculously you can actually feel and hold a postcard, pick it up and flick it around. You can even put them in the spokes on your new $2500 bike that was ridden once last year. All kidding aside this is pretty cool in our book and helps out a few people in a tough spot either in training or getting motivated to run a marathon for the first time. If you feel like this is something you would like or would like to share with a friend or family member? Please take the time to pass it on!!!
and the lilac blossom --
So, if you are looking for a fun and easy way to waste a few minutes here and there, try Zynga Poker.
The grand prize winner will receive a complimentary dinner and beverage for four people in the newly-named dining venue, along with a $10 gift certificate to the college’s student-run Bakery. Two runners-up also will be chosen, each of whom will receive a complimentary dinner and beverage for two, plus a $10 bakery certificate.
I sometimes sacrifice sharpness in the details and lack of manual focus, but those are the fun challenges when doing this kind of shooting.
Bag: Old Navy
cook the patties for 15 to 20 minutes per side. you will know when to turn them as they will be dark, golden brown and formed a nice crust. if it hasn't started to happen after 10 minutes, raise the heat a bit. the idea is for a longer, slow cooking. don't move them until the end of the cooking time (unless you feel the heat is too high and they are burning).
Kevin Mulcahy, now 38, grew up vintage Americana in suburban Washington: altar boy, Eagle Scout, varsity basketball, class vice president. He was a son of Donald V. Mulcahy, a 28-year-career senior official of the C.I.A., four of whose six children were also employed by the agency. Kevin, the oldest child, began working full-time for the C.I.A. in 1963, after serving as an airborne radio operator in the Navy. He became a communications and computer expert and worked on highly classified programs that he will not talk about today. In 1968, he resigned from the agency to take a position in the electronics industry. There followed a Page 55 succession of increasingly responsible jobs in the computer industry, a serious drinking problem that drove him into Alcoholics Anonymous, and a painful divorce.
That was a month and a half ago. But we haven’t forgotten the lesson that the Lord has taught us – He is the author of life, and that life is a gift from His hand. Psalm 139 has been one of my favorite Scripture for a long time for the sheer fact that God’s presence is inescapable (Ps. 139:7-10). That suits me just fine especially since I am prone to go hiding in times of deep guilt and intense storms. And I’ve discovered that I can’t. When I come back to my senses, however, and I find myself in the loving embrace of the Lord again, I’m glad that we can’t hide, run away, ignore, refuse, or deny His ever-presence. I mean, this is our Father we are talking about. The One who conceived you and knew you even before you were conceived in your mother’s womb (Jer. 1:5). His hands created every part of you, knitting you together (Ps. 139:13). And to David the magnitude of this train of thought staggers him, and seemingly at a loss for words, he declares, I am fearfully and wonderfully made (Ps. 139:14).
But there were still two pairs to go, with four of the fastest men, so I had about 13 more minutes to hold my breath. To try to keep it short – after the next pair, Bob de Jong (an amazing skater, period – but especially amazing for being 35 – from the Netherlands) had beaten Jonathan’s time by a full second, but Alexis Contin had fallen behind and Jonathan was still in second.
The students then took photographs of each other and uploaded them to the computers. To create their collages we initially used Photoshop Elements to edit the photos, add frames and arrange them, but this was quite tricky to do.
1 cup uncooked lentils (for quick versions used canned)
So, not quite a photo per day, but whatever. I get points for trying, right?
DEUTERONOMY 17:19-20
While going through my grandmother's possessions (some years back), I discovered a cross-stitch sampler I had sewn for her and given, unframed. There it was, exactly as I had given it to her, in a drawer. Not on the wall, like the pieces I had framed for her, not sewn into a pillow, just carefully put away. This was an important lesson to me. It's not finished until it's finished. A quilt top is just a piece of fabric. An ornament without a hanger is just a bobble looking for a place to be. With this in mind, I show you the latest progress on these pieces.For the longest time, the link to A Stitch in Time has gone to the "I got nothin'" page. Now I can show you. The embroidery is done and the photo has a minimum of fuzzy. It's tiny, so I intend to make this into a little Christmas tree ornament.Avignon Santa is nearly done. He's been cut out from the perforated paper he was stitched onto and just needs his felt backing. I plan to glue him to the felt, then carefully cut around it. A Bird of Love is holding my attention more than I thought. I purchased a pattern that claimed to be filet cross-stitch. I thought it was more complicated in the original pattern, but this one just said, stitch it normally but with only one thread. A little disappointing, that. But certainly do-able. Finally, In the Garden just needs to be framed. Looking at it just transports me! I very sneakily signed it inside the terracotta planter. If you look carefully, you may see "desi 11".
A few years ago I went to a national health-profession convention where delegates could propose resolutions to be debated and possibly adopted. The quality of these fell equally into three categories: worthwhile, innocuous, ill-advised. Having previous experience in such things, the group with whom I attended encouraged me to be a delegate. They demanded that I continue to be a delegate for their own amusement after witnessing my participation in the first session.
beat this molesting bastard to a pulp
The Buddhist, Hindu and Jain apps would offer karma risk calculation tables, for the Hindus there could be all kinds of extras like God of the Day, the Buddhists can call up appropriate sayings of the Dalai Lama … the possibilities are endless!
-If you are good with BYOND macros, I heard you are allowed to make a hotkey to make digging easier. This is unconfirmed however, so best to ask the GM that is on at the time before proceeding (or do so at your own risk). Last I heard, third party devices for macroing your dig is NOT allowed, however.
My list begins with a wordless picture book. Without text, Barry Miller simply gives us his remarkable photographs of images that portray each letter of the alphabet. Letter forms can be found in the shapes of traffic lights, coffee cups and even police barricades. Each page is covered with transparent tissue with the represented letter printed boldly. Children will enjoy tracing each letter and then locating it in the photograph below. This is an old book; check your local library for a copy.
"First move into your heart and call on us. We will meet you there. The Net of Light is lit by the jewel of your heart," they said, "so move into this lighted place within you and open to the Net of which you are a part. Bask in its calming presence. It holds you at the same time that you hold it.
5 Tenth Avenue Freeze-out (with Tom Morello)
Nothing can beat, when you apply sunscreen on arms but forget the face.
For instance, I’ve made exactly one gingerbread house, and it was initiated by me last year (I built it with my little sister). Or, we never had a turkey. Our Christmas Eve meals have ranged from chinese fondue to catered Subway. We do have a tree, every year, and presents do happen.
I started to understand the emergence of the sky and the movement of watery energy within the circle above her head. When I think of heaven, I immediately think of the sky and what is above it. So the sky is representing “heaven” and her ladder is showing she is not attached to the life she is living. She has elevated herself to reflect that very profound saying “Be in the world, but not of it.”
He invited the audience, the soldiers, all who where there ... to come and say hello afterward, give him a hug (which he couldn't return), and introduce themselves. They lined up. It was absolutely crazy. They lined up and hugged him. I stood back and took it in.
We all try to live on our own,
Well, it isn’t really about Steve Wright, nor about the girls, though of course they loom large. The “stars” of this show are the forgotten chorus of the tragedy, the residents who saw their street demonised every night as a “red light district” by the media circus that trampled over their gardens and their sensibilities for the sake of yet another shot of number 79, where the murderer lived. The drama charts their various projects – raffles, quiz nights, garden competitions – that they hope will restore their fractured community. The libretto really is their words; all the speeches and songs are verbatim transcripts gathered by playwright Alecky Blythe, who has burnished and beaten the base metal of”ums” and “ermms” into a script that shines with the rhythms of real language.
We've both come a long way since that first class. It's also nice to know that there's a man who actually looks forward to the opportunity of having me step on his foot.
Larry Clark (1 gelatin silver, 1972-1973)
This AM I pulled up to daycare and Talan says,"Whoa, School!" I was like yayayaya!! Took him and and he started playing and looked at me waived and said Bye Bye. I think he will do just fine. He loves playing with kids so I know he enjoys it. This makes for a happy mommy!
- Any other social skills
blog post widget. There is a check box there to remove it from your
Copyright 2012 Tereciah V. Smithen-Quitnana
A few days later she gave me a medium reading and my Great-Granny Bella used the knock knock joke to let me know she is watching over me.
Direct. XIII. If you are married to one that is an ungodly person, yet keep up all the love which is due for the relation’s sake.(37)
Yay! I went out of the house!
I've kept it very simple, just adding some ribbon for the handle and a fancy brad on the front to represent a clasp. Of course, you could add an image or some flowers if you wanted to go to town a bit!!!
The phantom kicks, and dreams of crying newborns........
crabmeat, salmon with avocado and sprouts over lettuce.
Above you can see that the shredded silk has been put to better use with a pale and rather large item instead. The pattern/texture is still a part of the shot, but isn't overwhelming things. The general rule you is you must be careful that your background isn't more fabulous than your product (and it's getting dangerously close above!). Think of it like a wedding- you want everything to be beautiful, but the brightest star is the bride. Your item is the bride.
And what does this mean?
So here are the photos of the the 60 CAS wedding invitations made.
If for any reason the cost of answering this request would exceed the appropriate limit then I will happily accept the information as it relates to the last 20 requests (starting from 28 March 2012 and working backwards) for Information responded to (inclusive of EIR responses) by Avon and Somerset Constabulary.
In GWW, this very citation of the 1998 CDF statement comes under the heading, “Official Statements from the Catholic Magisterium on the Inspiration and Inerrancy of Sacred Scripture”. And here is what Bob has to say about the nature of this quote, which is included by him with other magisterial statements without any qualification:
Three councils — Hackney, Newham and Oxfordshire — even cater for Maltese, even though English is an official language on the bilingual island of Malta.
Even in the dark I picture it, and all
14) Who are the Mythbusters?
Gruen Nation, the election themed rendition of the already great The Gruen Transfer, was better in every way. Who would have ever thought that the show that made advertising interesting could do the same thing for politics? Gruen Nation was like a super sized Transfer with a panel of regulars that outshone the admen who usually appear on the show. John Hewson, Neil Lawrence and Annabel Crabb were all refreshingly candid and amusing throughout the short series. The show could have even done without series regulars Todd Sampson and Russel Howcroft and still been great. If only the ABC could spin this off into a non-election themed political panel show with Hewson, Lawrence and Crabb as regulars and Wil Anderson as the host. Anderson would love it; he’d get to bring out all his long dead John Howard material. If the ABC don’t create the show that exists only in my head we’re just going to have to sit tight until the next election before we get to see Gruen Nation again.
“The games industry is very much like a Lion pride. Studios come and go while only the best are left to rule. Many come to challenge the alpha studios rule and while the majority fall, some are left victorious. In Supersonic Software’s case, they stand as an aged pack leader, remembered for the cult classics Mashed and Micro Machines but knocked from the top spot long ago by younger studios.
Anarchists stand against vanguardism. They are advocates of direct action, though they understand this in a variety of ways and adopt very different attitudes to questions of violence, disobedience and protest. Because they reject institutional politics, anarchists are often dismissed as hopeless idealists. Anyone prepared to engage with the order that anarchists see at the heart of anarchy will find this a strange reversal.
Once the official part of the party was over the students were allowed to lift the food coverings and offer around the plates to their parents. They showed remarkable restraint as they served the adults party food and drinks, before tucking in themselves. As mentioned before, each table had a completely different selection of treats but after a while they were allowed to move around to other tables and finish off the rest of the food.
What struck me quickly about a company who offer print solutions was the lack of definition and resolution to the images of books on the website. Some of the images are poor and that is never a good sign to start with. The website of any company trading and advertising on line is their own shop window and the place where a company makes its first impression.
These are actually called something else, which gives a negative connontation with car bombs. Due to the offense of that name, abbreviated ICB, I've updated this post to reflect a new title.
an utterly striking red speckled exterior and beans which had reversed colouring.
His name is Yahweh.
A sizzling debut from a red-hot new author . . .
Piece by piece
It’s 9.21am and I can hear various elements of the neighbourhood pass me by. I hear a gardener, the soft hum of the mailman on his way to carry out his morning duties and several cars passing by my street, each and every one on their way to something different. Blue skies with smatterings of cloud. Normalcy. Perfect normalcy.
“Wanna watch a film based on the 16th-century Bruegel painting, The Procession to Calvary?”
We solemnly ask you to take a moment on November 11 and remember those who have given their lives in the current war against terrorism being waged in Iraq and Afghanistan and to say a prayer for every one of them. They died so that we may continue to live free.
It’s late afternoon and Rik Mayall and Adrian Edmondson are preparing for their umpteenth photo shoot of the day. They seem a little tired of all the attention. But as soon as the photographer starts snapping, it’s a different story. The performance begins.
period covered by the CARA database, the number of priests with
Introducing Blue Sail Studios by the sea jewelry collection handmade organic rustic styling in fine silver. From ocean waves to starfish my new collection is underway. Early stages at the moment but, it's moving forward which is the important part right?
Mark Driscoll says “The world is a valley and the scriptures are a mountain”. This book is no different. It is an opportunity to climb up and see from God’s perspective. The question is, “Will we take it to heart?”
"I think Senator Rubio has been the victim of body-snatching by groups that would try to provide a back door to citizenship," Kaufman said between broadcasts. "He promised me in my studio that that wasn't going to happen. When he got to the national level, immigration was going to be controlled. He was going to stay firm.
He has also posted this video on youtube as an appeal to media outside of Japan. This is the first time I have heard him speak in English since he is always using his fluent Japanese (Yamagata dialect) on TV!
Just as everyone else has written about the end of summer holidays, I'm doing the same thing. Tomorrow is my official day back to work. Unofficially, myself and several other colleagues (keeners) have been working on and off all summer long preparing for the year.
Added some fruit to go with this cereal
Water hookup nearby: 2 nights @ $60 = $120, 2 nights @ $50 = $100, one night free, total $220 for 5 nights.
3. Game Mechanics – Overall, this is a cooldown-based MMO. It feels a lot like World of Warcraft in terms of how abilities work and how your character moves and fights. There are no auto-attacks, which is a major difference. There are class-specializations, as well — they go beyond Talent Trees, too.
Why doesn’t the EDL Embrace Diversity? Why doesn’t it contribute to Community Cohesion? Why are they Racist Thugs?
I´m still having a great time, even though life in the country is always, constantly, work. Today I spent three hours with two people cutting logs and piling them, so there would be enough wood to keep us warm in the uninsulated house.
I said in my title that there was something nice that happened this week, actually there's two nice things
Nature shall live to manifest secret God,
Sweet Mother is updated daily. If you’d like to follow this blog, simply hit the “follow” button in the upper, right hand, corner.
1. Go Do – 4:41
I bet in the US there's lots of traffic as everyone runs around like mad things trying to do their last minute shopping. Traffic and commerce and stress.....
-Place a muslin cloth in a colander and pour the contents into it,Squeeze it tight and remove excess water.Place the wrapped paneer under running cold water to remove sourness of vinegar/lemon juice.Squeeze all the water possible in it.
One of the places we (our tour group) visited when I went to Seoul is The National Folk Museum of Korea. Located in the heart of Seoul and right next to Gyeongbokgung Palace, the national museum features over 98,000 artifacts and comprises of three exhibition halls.
However, what a lot of them have in common is that they ask multiple questions which I've actually already answered here or on my website. So to save time with the most straightforward ones, I thought I'd round up.
Oyster
Check that one off my list.
Gingrich: yes but Mitt Romney used to
So what did I do? Took my rejection and my loss and I allowed myself to feel disappointed, sad and cry, because that what was honest, and as that moment passed I reexamined my work and I found that I was happy with the work that I put forth and then I submitted elsewhere.
I had what I am going to go ahead and step out on a limb and call a NSV today. It was a coworker's bday and they bought a big ASS Oreo Icecream CAKE for the celebration. I TOTALLY made Megan check the nutrition info (found SO conveniently on the BOTTOM of the damn thing) and there was something sickening like 240 cals for 1/16th of the cake. So like 1/2 oz of cake would equal 240 cals. I sat there, and I longingly stared at it, as it was about a foot and a half from my face, while Megan cut the pieces and placed each HEAVING piece on paper plates. I sat and stared some more. Then I somehow by the grace of GOD himself, I scraped my mind and my addict tendencies OUT of la-la cake land, got up and LEFT the office.
Alex joked that the hardest decision you have to make on a honeymoon is what time to switch from coffee to wine. On this sail, we switched over before noon. (When the skipper asked if we'd like a beer, Alex looked at his watch; the skipper laughed, "The time doesn't matter! You're in Greece!")
Did I pray for her at the restaurant? Yes. Did I have money which I could give her? No. Did I ask my mom to do anything? No. Regardless, I feel like the lowly fly you swat at because you find disgust with it. In the end I am left with the fact and filth I didn’t do what Christ Jesus would do.
Just before leaving, I ask them how they have managed to maintain such a successful professional partnership into a third decade, in an industry that generally doesn’t foster bonds of such longevity.
The gona was hidden by Mhembere. He did not give it to Nyamare. Then from that time Mhembere moved from Chishawasha and went to Chief Chiweshe at the pool called Dziwa Risekwa. While he lived there Chiweshe was friendly with him and he made axes, hoes, spears, arrows and knives.
Staffing is expensive; knowledge is critical and productivity is paramount in ensuring optimized global programme management. Global programme management gets complex whether out-sourced or in-sourced, despite a pragmatic dashboard of KPIs and routine reviews. Assessing global programmes, using local expert interventions can make “business as usual” predictable and efficient. Likewise, a dispassionate assessment of the application portfolio, and a pragmatic life-cycle planning, can shed costs and unleash more bandwidth to innovate.
Source: CNBC.com
It took me about 1 1/2 hours to make each wreath (don't forget I have a little one I'm chasing so it might take you a little less time). Plus, I have found that the quickest way to make the lollies is to score first and then cut. In other words, if you are using two sided designer series paper then most likely you will be using the pattern on the other side, so cut your dsp at 3" x 12" and score every 1/4". Once you are finished with your scoring then cut your dsp in half so that now you should have 2 strips of scored dsp that measures 1 1/2" x 12". Since I was making more than one wreath using the same dsp I cut my dsp at 6" x 12"- then I scored every 1/4" and then I cut my paper into 1 1/2" x 12" strips.
What would you do differently with the publishing of your next book?
I am not suggesting that associating ordinary Muslims with terrorists is either rational or right. It's neither. But the association arises via a normal aspect of brain functioning, which is precisely why so many people entertain such beliefs—and why those beliefs have proved so resistant to challenge.
First, a few basics about periodization.
Hi everyone hope you are all well and looking forward to the nice long bank holiday weekend I know I am !!
And in the end, I did nothing. I did nothing but prepare her for a future attack. I gave her permission to walk away. I told her if he did something like that again to come get me or text me. I told her he was wrong and did what I could to support her. But I did not confront him.
I have some other definite favorites, as I am sure that we all do. And, I like a huge variety of music. In December 2011, I wrote two blogs about Christmas songs that I really like. Please check them out.
Splits - 8:53, 9:00, 9:22, 9:03, 9:08
After the film, Feuerzeig fielded questions from an initially timid audience and briefly discussed his current projects (two docs about The Monks and Tiny Tim).
This one was very heartbreaking to read. I felt so badly for Liz and how everyone treats her when she comes back. I had to give her a lot of credit for being able to hold her head high when everyone is keeps saying horrible things to her. While I felt for Ethan and understood his anger over having missed 11 years with his son, I thought he was a total ass through most of the book. Both characters are so obviously right for each other. It just takes them a while to put past hurts aside and admit it to themselves. I loved how Ethan sets things right in the end.
So long Big Man. The scene may be coming to an end but there’s always a gig for you somewhere down Thunder Road.
I spent part of the holiday weekend organizing my stitching stuffs,making my lists, designed, stitched and graphed my annual Christmas Ornament for 2012, made soup, and cut and bagged veggies for lunches this week. Geesh... I need another 4 day weekend! Here is my WIPocalypse list:
The smaller scrips were still noticed the most vibrant participant of the market, and it may bring the blue chip back into the ring.
Jarvis Sheffield, M.Ed. is owner & operator of TheDigitalBrothers.com, BlackScienceFictionSociety.com & BlackCommunityEntertainment.com. Visit him: http://www.blacksciencefictionsociety.com/profiles/blog/list?user=2stjwb1h216fd
LG has launched its latest series of Cinema 3D Smart TVs, incorporating Cinema Screen design and large screen size 3D TVs.
Voice Acting: 10/10
His subjects were his friends and fellow addicts. His access to this environment, and the opportunity to photograph it, came from his own participation. He shows us another form of intimacy, we see in graphic detail what some may view as distasteful scenes of drug abuse and casual sex.
Here's to my 28th year! :)
In general, the place is trying: The ice situation is good (lots of it, decent crusher). The non-happy hour menu has some interesting choices. But, they just aren’t in the same league as my preferred cocktail stops.
Garlic - 5 cloves finely chopped
Ella as a happy child.
more info on my blog
You toured extensively with Sigur Rós – what did you learn and what were the highlights.
In fact, Hazel almost single-handedly undoes whatever negative effects the Twilight series, and Bella in particular, may have had on my appreciation for young adult novels. Which isn’t to say that I didn’t love the Twilight books; I did, but for they are: indulgent and ludicrous trash. By contrast, where Bella is a wishy-washy blank slate with no discernible interests or personality to speak of, Hazel is a complete human being who—although she falls in love with Augustus—very clearly exists outside of him. Moreover, this is not a plot of teen vampire abstinence or wars with supernatural governing bodies. TFIOS is about cancer, and is therefore as steeped in reality as Twilight is removed from it.
Her parents are an amazing couple and their love of their daughter is amazing. I highly recommend you read her story and learn more about the disease SMA so that someday we can find a cure.
Lucy is upset at what is happening to Hibbs -- those men seizing him, binding him, carrying him away, saying he must be drunk. Jerry is never drunk! The bat-woman tries to calm her. Please, dear, she says, didn't he tell you to remember your part and do it, no matter what? Yes, Lucy says, but he said he'd take care of Jerry, see that he comes to no harm. And so he will, the woman says, we all will. She turns to the man in the beaver hat. What was wrong with him? Too much excitement, the man says; he'll be taken care of and kept out of harm's way. But now we have to work fast.
1med banana ripe
An undercover investigation on Russian TV into Archpriest Mikhail Grigoriev of Kazan has raised wider questions about the propriety of the country’s clerics and their relationship with wealthy donors who contribute to restoration work.
Wooden letters from a craft/hobby store (anywhere from $1.99 – $3.99 ea., depending on the size and fanciness of the letter shape)
-on a green tariff with edf they commit to getting energy from renewable sources. There are green companies but too expensive
April 14, 1906 Pg 3
RATING REVISION: 5.8/10
And really, that's about all I can say. Apart from the fact that I will be looking forward to following the remaining two cases that Michael Blomkvist and Lisbeth Salander take on with great pleasure!
What do you say to that? I mean how do you respond to that? "Oh gimme! Let me see" ? or "Oh, you have one of these too?" I suppressed my urge to say well, that's healthy, ya freak and decided to go with, "Wow, a whole book?"
This tutorial will demonstrate some simple techniques for making text jump off the screen.
so I got a recipe from Rae for Baked Oatmeal. Here it is:
We started out by throwing a sliced red onion in a pan to caramelize and sauteing a half pound of sliced mushrooms in butter.
Those dynamic opening shots – the big wave, the high-speed zoom, the wiggling hips – were perfectly synchronised to perhaps the most thrilling theme music in television history. Quite rightly, the tune was reprised in the closing sequence featuring burly Polynesian oarsmen heaving away in their canoe. When tourists ask me what to do if a crocodile approaches their rowboat, I tell them to paddle like the blazes while dah-dahing the Hawaii-Five-0 theme. It never fails to add a couple of knots to your speed, which can make the difference between a lightning flight and a frightening bite. The Eton Boating Song is a nursery rhyme for lethargic sea slugs by comparison.
The blog has been quiet the last few weeks, the reason for that is a mix of too much work, the temporary pause playing RuneQuest waiting for RQ6 (and Moon Designs Pavis, which I received last week), and the fact that the weather has remained so chilly: I really prefer sitting in my hobby room without the heater blowing, and when it's so cold I can't: I just have to heat it. As a consequence I find I head down less often. Still, I am still painting now and again, currently working on a set of Tusk Riders, a nice collection of zombies, and I also have a bunch of NPCs that I need to finish off, just some basing and finishing touches and we're good to go.
not at all the artist you said
I said if I achieved all my goals I would give myself a pedicure and while I earned it and would love to get one I just can't afford it right now. I'm trying to figure out how to put gas in my tank next week, let alone trying to figure out a pedicure! I will make sure in March to reward myself, hopefully then our financial situation is better. So while I am upset about the scale in January overall I have to be proud of myself for doing a good job.
Most of yesterday (Wed 25th) was just too depressing to write about I’m afraid. I’m not sure when our map was last updated, but I am pretty sure that mile after mile of petrochemical plants and rust belt industrial infrastructure should disqualify a road being marked “scenic”. I do however admire the courage of the local government in anointing the bit of land between a refinery and ship loading facility a “protected nature reserve”. However clearly from the number of locals enjoying their Liberation Day picnic here other options are slim.
Finally, after having bottle conditioned the beer I began to find the bottles were wildly varied in carbonation level. Some are mildly carbonated (see picture above, definitely not proper saison carb level) others are effervescent. I believe that the priming sugar didn't get mixed up well enough in the bottling bucket.
Paulaner Salvator Double Bock German beer. Another beer I had at Allyn's Cafe in my around the world trip of beers. I remember it having a very smooth chocolate taste (as most bocks do). I don't think I have ever seen this beer at the store. I probably wouldn't buy it all that often, but for a change it can be nice (probably more of a fall/winter brew to me).
1Now when he saw the crowds, he went up on a mountainside and sat down. His disciples came to him, 2and he began to teach them saying:
We all like to think that what is on our Ipods represent our awesome musical taste, one that would knock the socks off the pretty girl sitting next to you on the train or earn you kudos from some arbiter of coolness if they got a hold of your device.
So here is me 38, can't spell for toffee and new to the world of blogging. How can it not be a riotous success!
I will be giving away a $15 giftcard to your favorite craft store or online store!
But I think it is time to revisit some of this classic cheese of time past, so I may just be making the dungeon-heavy Castle Krake area and it’s interesting sandbox surroundings the setting for the next campaign.
#18 Real Genius
~Danielle Thorne
Are you unable to watch TV without munching on something? Is the excitement of a road trip partially due to potential gas station snacks? Do you use food to pass the time at an especially boring job? How about when you can't sleep at night, do you find yourself perusing the refrigerator?
myfreshwaterpearls.com contacted me with an offer to do a product review for them, and sent me this lovely pendant. What can I say? I have always had a weakness for pearls, and their products are beautiful. Not that I would buy jewelry for myself, but if I was looking for a special gift for a special someone, it might have been one of my possible choices.
Abstracts
Firstly, the Singapore male is already disadvantaged by having to spend 4 weeks away from work annually due to reservist obligations.
“We are considering renting out the boat for scientific or commercial uses or even selling it,” Stroeher told Wired. “We are open for ideas and in talks with interested parties — from the use as a ‘green’ luxury yacht to scientific usages and the utilization as the world’s largest mobile solar power battery, everything is possible.”
I hear mixed reviews about this from visitors. There are those who fall into the "it's a free country, spit yourselves out" column. Then, there are the kissing-condemners who secretly fantasize about pulling the fused-heads apart long enough to slap their still-wet faces.
You make beautiful things out of us.
It's the official first weekend of summer. Known on the calendar as a national holiday, Memorial Day has changed a great deal from its beginnings just after the Civil War. Then is was known as Decoration Day and it was a day designed for Americans to go out and honor the American war dead by decorating their graves. My grandmother and mother always called the day by its original name and I remember taking flats of geraniums and marigolds to the cemetery in Livonia, Michigan where most of my ancestors are buried. We'd pull weeds and put in new flower plantings for most of the morning. Then we'd go home and barbecue in the backyard to complete the day.
I hope my work and my tutorial will like you and see you soon. I wish all of you a fabulous day.
We’ll allay the Injun nation;
“At least 600 people gathered carrying placards supporting the unification of the two groups — people chanted Allahu Akbar (God is great)” said Abdikarin Adan, a witness.
I’ve had a good run at racing recently. I’ve set a couple of PRs, and felt like I was becoming a stronger runner. It might have made me cocky and arrogant. Those days are over. I was well and truly humbled by the Nashville Country Music Half Marathon. The list of mistakes that I made during this race (and a couple of unlucky breaks) was truly phenomenal.
Thank you for ______. (helping your sibling)
I guess I have a thing for ferns since I have three fern prints hanging above the couch. That reminds me....I need to plant a few more this spring. I like to clip the stems and use them in flower arrangements or pop them in a little vase by themselves.
More than that, how do you find joy when you are faced with something or someone that sucks the joy right out of you?
My second piece of news is that my first article has been published on Active.com. You can read the story by following this link: http://www.active.com/running/Articles/6-Tips-to-Stay-Motivated-With-Your-Training.htm. I hope you enjoy it and I look forward to working with their staff to publish future articles.
I was an athlete in my early school days. I ran track, played basketball, danced and required lots and lots of carbs. My main choice of a meal was spiral Mac ‘n Cheese. It had to be the spirals because it tasted different, better. I still strongly believe this! Anyway, I ate all the freaken time and finished off boxes of mac ‘n cheese and loaves of bread. I was skinny though! The skinniest I’ve been. My body was meant to be active and all that food was purely fuel.
love makes things simple
Bryan Ferry, that he sung with such an obviously English voice, when
*Take a virtual field trip of a museum online.
*Thinking we would now be moving very quickly toward bringing our kids home, new developments are discouraging and it make take longer than we thought.
A Scots Quair is a Scots classic- on the syllabus for O Grade English. It is a book I would expect a Scot to have heard of, but not an English person- a bit like The Private Memoirs and Confessions of a Justified Sinner, it speaks to us about us. In Cloud Howe, the second novel of the trilogy, Chris Guthrie marries a minister in a small town. Everyone’s business is everyone’s business, they gossip about it incessantly, always putting the nastiest interpretation on any fact. In Grey Granite, the third novel, such is the love and anger of Gibbon at the exploitation of the working class that I felt a strong pull towards his Communism while reading it, which was a strange experience for a Tory law student.
But he could still run though, except for that 'swagger' he got from that accident. It didn't deter his will and determination, though, as the following year at the NYC marathon he was at the center of the spotlight displaying his bravery amidst all odds by participating in the marathon.
There is a whole field of study called “social cognitive theory” which stems from “social learning theory”. So much of what we think we know has been learned from the cultural setting that nurtures us. It shapes our behavior, our likes and dislikes, and even to some degree to how we respond to aesthetics. It is from this body of information that we shape our dogma, and how we form attitudes that allow the infectious nature of urban myth to spread.
Approaching the center in his black Mercedes-Benz, equipped with an amped V-12 engine and a police radar detector, Larry Ruvo talked about visits by former Presidents Bill Clinton, George H.W. Bush, George W. Bush and former Secretary of State Colin Powell. But he seemed especially proud that Ali took a tour last year, with his wife, Lonnie. The boxing legend, who turned 70 on Jan. 17, doesn’t leave his Paradise Valley, Ariz., home very often, but he wanted to see the center and wanted to help Ruvo raise money for a disease that has fundamentally altered his life. After the visit, Ali lent his name to the Muhammad Ali 70th Birthday Celebration Weekend, which benefited the Lou Ruvo Center and the Muhammad Ali Center in Louisville, Ky. The champ doesn’t speak much anymore, but Lonnie has expressed her gratitude, paying special attention to the focus the center gave to the dignity of patients, families and caregivers.
For our first stop, we headed over to Lynn Canyon. This had been my favorite of all of our previous Vancouver explorations. The old growth forests, waterfalls, and suspension bridge got the same sort of "wow" from Grammy and Pa that we had given them!
Obviously cutting the recipe down IS an option. This makes a lot of stew – and as far as I can remember – it does freeze and reheat fine. Just be careful not to burn it when reheating. I prefer to reheat on the stove, not in a microwave.
So, here's my finished piece and a close-up of the beads/lights. The lights are supposed to represent fireflies. The few trees represent the few trees remaining after Hurricane Irene did a number on my backyard down by the creek. The piece is due March 3rd and at the same time we are starting another challenge that is called a grab bag challenge. Each participant puts supplies for a quilted wall hanging in a big baggie - your name is NOT on the bag and you will not know who gets your bag. The finished piece is due March 2013 and should be about 20 inches square. You must use 65% of the contents of the bag you're given. The catch? Whatever you create will go back to the person who created that grab bag. Your bag can contain anything for making an art quilt - beads, fabrics, thread, ribbons, lace, buttons, paints, yarn, whatever floats your boat. Should be a very interesting challenge.
Good condition
Hearing your screech sounds from the sky
Not the cherubic creatures that adorn architecture or valentines. Malachey Elyon, messengers of the most high, may be anyone who is sent. It is required only that there be an errand, a message.
MediaPost shares some statistics from ABCi’s recent mobile survey about publishers’ outlook on their digital future.
The Lord allows trials to come our way to test us, but that is not His primary purpose. Rather, our afflictions are to teach us to walk rightly before Him. The Bible says: "Many are the afflictions of the righteous . . ." (Psalm 34:19). According to the psalmist, the point of all our afflictions is for us to learn from them.
For thirty-six years, you have never broken that promise. Not once. No matter what I did, or what I did not do but should have done.
This wondrous mission
Fancy!
Okay nobody thinks I am cheesy now right? Well don't tell me if you do! I printed this poem off on cardstock and inked the edges with a brown inkpad. I then hotglued it to the paper covered foam board. I think it is time for a little assembling. So I glued the foamboard shelf, now covered with moss) onto the picture frame. I held it in place while it got very sturdy and the glue hardened right up. Then I glued my little bunnies onto the shelf, I also glued their little backsides onto the foamboard in the picture frame so that helps support the shelf and bunnies!
Looking for practice with basic skills? Lower elementary grades will love the worksheets to practice skills like calendar, money, numbers, alphabet, and time.
I told him I was fairly sure I’d had an epidural before, but he still wanted me to talk with them. Also, he wants to do a growth scan and formally ensure that Morgan is head down still- so we set that up for our next appointment (when Dr. M will finally be there!) I made sure to schedule this appointment so daddy could tag along and be well rested, too! Next stop? Anesthesia consult.
i don't think i ever did that.
The weather has turned chilly here in Texas. It is truly lovely. I love this time of year and so looked forward to having a chubby baby in my arms to enjoy it. Aidan was supposed to be born on September 20th, a week ago today. When we found out he was going to be born in September my first thought was how great it would be to celebrate his birthdays in the amazing weather that September brings. It's not too hot and not too cold and generally ranges from 68 - 75 degrees and sunny. I imagined outdoor parties, cook outs, little boys and girls running through the house with melted popcicles praying that they would only stain the carpets and not my furniture, and Aidan and his daddy watching football together on the weekends. Then I thought about what we would dress him up as for Halloween. He would be 1 month then (I thought) and probably a big chunk so maybe a pumpkin or a puppy or something else adorable. Then I thought about what Christmas would be like with a 3 month old. I had planned to have Christmas at our house inviting the whole family over and cooking a big Christmas dinner with ham and turkey and a ton of sides and desserts. Andrew and I love to cook and love family and blending the two sounded like heaven.
Now back to work sewing more towels: I've got 4 girl, 2 boy, and 1 gender neutral set on the way to my shop!
The round circle was taunting me to use the "U" die once again, but alas, my "U" Die support group meetings have been doing their job LOL!
I asked J&S if that was something they were interested in. They were like, "Um...not really." (They already do quite a bit of shoveling-for-money here at home!)
Now she shows true colours :-
I also bought a few books from the SC Book Festival:
Against this background I deplore the tendency which seems to me to have been growing in leading Government spokesmen in the last few weeks to pose as crusaders for spiritual values in the struggle against the world's materialists. Frankly, I think this sort of posture striking comes no better from them than it did from Mr. Foster Dulles—especially when the temple of their religion is the bingo parlour and when their
Special Features:
Love is not something you can create, it is some which exists (or doesn’t). If you love someone, that person will feel wonderful from any way you express your love, however small or insignificant. If you don’t love someone, nothing you do for them will ever satisfy their hearts.
On 12th February 1832, the newly independent Ecuador annexed the islands calling them the Archipelago of Ecuador. The islands initially served as a penal colony governed by General José de Villamil, who sent an exploratory commission there in the previous October. He then set up the Colonising society of the Archipelago of the Galápagos to exploit the lichens that grew there, which served as a dye. Artisans and farmers soon joined the convicts to colonise the islands.
Most everyone is super positive and friendly, but we noticed one thing - both of us, independently noticed this. There is a minority of people, just a few really, who obviously avoid our eyes. They notice Charlie, I see them notice him, and they get a strange, uncomfortable, maybe shocked look, and they look up, down or sideways...any which way to not look at Charlie in his chair, or at us. This is not the same as people not seeing Charlie altogether, there is some of that too - although not much, admittedly, because he really calls attention to himself. It's very clear they see him, and they want to stare but they don't want to. If they happen to catch my eye against their will, I just smile at them. I don't really care, because it's totally their loss. If they are feeling sad for him and don't know how to handle it, they should rest assured he has no clue he's in a sad situation. Maybe they just don't know what to think.
Since the rise in the interest of Archeology in the late 1800's, physical evidence of people, cultures and cities that only existed in the Bible were being discovered, establishing the Bible as an historical document. Werner Keller Writes “In Palestine, places and towns which are frequently mentioned in the Bible are being brought back once more....exactly as the Bible describes them...exactly were the Bible locates them.”
-Imperial IPA
Food Chains in Habitat: This assessment is part of an exploring activity where students are asked to observe and aquarium trying to identify its elements and members. Some questions for inferences are asked in order to assess students in identifying the functions of these elements and the relationship among them. Additionally, knowledge is expected to be applied in the last two questions being able to identify examples of other aquatic environments and animals and by ordering a food chain. Answer keys are provided.
Gone i want it and myself gone, toxic, perforated disgusted I am.
Cars, Campervans and Motorhomes
Me: No, you aren’t supposed to take it off.
Now on to our Top Three as chosen by the design team. The winning cards and designers are as follows:
I had a little bit of trouble with the ganache. Apparently you can't substitute 2% milk for heavy cream. Go figure.
...to be continued in San Orleans...maybe I go back again..
Then again, the European system for the protection of human rights is very elaborated and exhaustive, a particular system, with concrete mechanisms of protection and precise principles to be effectively applied (such as the balance I was talking about).
Over on Vikki’s site, I learned that today is Insecure Writer’s Day. I think there’s a support group of some kind that I’m not a member of, but I should be. I’ll look into that.
Five tablespoons per day - taken in the morning will hold you through lunch with complete nourishment.
― Dave Ramsey
Some people manage their wardrobe instinctively well, others less so. If you are in the former group, well done. If you decide you need read no further Godspeed. If in the latter group I’ve got good news and bad news. The good news is that this is a blog about Building a Gentleman’s Wardrobe which will offer reflections and insights, arguments and observations which may help sharpen your wardrobe instincts. The bad news is that unless you have lots of money (and let’s face it who does these days?) it is a 5-year project to build a Gentleman’s wardrobe.
dropping from the sky.
“Hey, bro, do all those tall propellers in that field do any good?” Much like the chicken and the egg, how many colors in the rainbow, and why does my wife win all the arguments, it’s a question often asked and seldom answered to anyone’s satisfaction.
Granada looks & feels like a much larger city than it is, with a population of approximately 250,000 & an urban area population of about 475,000. It was founded in the 11th century & was originally a Muslim fortress. Granada is very cosmopolitan & a university city sitting at the base of the Sierra Nevada Mts.
I love the color green. It’s the color of life, found on many of the fruits and veggies we eat on a daily basis. And besides purple and dark blue (and sunflower yellow, dusty pink, sunset orange... I think you get it.), all shades of green are beautiful to me.
discover the Belgian architectural and interior design.
International relations department spokesperson Nomfanelo Kota said they were struggling to get the passenger list as it was with Libyan authorities, and until they had done their own checks, they didn't want to rush into saying how many South Africans were on board.
Welcome to the new IS&S Network Services blog! We have created this space as a source of information for everyone so that you can find answers to commonly asked questions quickly and easily, and as a source for up to the minute new regarding the status of the network.
But will it help me if I am "a little odd"? I'm not denying that I may be - though surely no-one ever regards themselves as odd? It's the other folk who are all a bit strange, isn't it? Especially if they don't invent dialogue in their heads, have conversations with imaginary people and suddenly glaze over in the middle of talking to other, real, people.
Deep Purple
Mikkeller Chinook Single Hop IPA
taking in the sun – not worrying much
“The Reichenbach Fall” alludes to that spectacular encounter in the form of a supposedly priceless painting of the tall Swiss cascade, which Holmes recovers near the beginning of this episode. However, the action in “Reichenbach” is firmly set in London, where the detective is called to testify against the insane criminal mastermind, Jim Moriarty (played by Andrew Scott), who has recently broken into the Tower of London and threatened the safety of the crown jewels on display. After Moriarty is declared--against all reason--to be “not guilty” of this headline-making transgression, he enters into a dangerous cat-and-mouse game with Holmes, determined to destroy the sleuth’s reputation and, in the process, prove that he, Moriarty, is the greater genius. The plot turns here tumble upon one another, making Holmes and Watson fugitives from the law and concluding with ... well, I won’t tell you how this outstanding episode ends, except to say that it will leave you scratching your head--in a good way--and looking forward to the third season of Sherlock.
I think the easy answer is that I’m an “everything in moderation” kind of person, and that is (and was) my goal for parenting. But that doesn’t even scratch the surface.
And I'm deftly waiting for you to smile and change your mind
That's all that kept going round in his head, 'something is wrong', on a loop.
Denza – Bravehard (Original Mix)
Native El Pasoan and internationally renown artist Luis Jimenez sculpted the sculpture which is now in danger of removal.
i'm fine now.
I was in agony for the next while, checking my phone every free chance I got, Then FINALLY
703 ***D-XI/9/1975. “Individuality and Schisms of the Soul: The Strange Case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Starved Rock State Park, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-3, above, pp. 215-25, 454-58 (1983).)
Next, is this dresser. She has such gorgeous lines, all curvy up front! I’m not sure how she will end up, but she will surely be painted, she has a bit of damage on one of the sides near the bottom.
They said she was 18 months, housebroken, with a slight chewing problem that they think stemmed from boredom at her last home. She was left all alone all day and chewed up a leather shoe. That seemed a simple enough fix.
How does it affect this site? Well, in some ways it doesn't except that I won't be writing any more manga obsessed entries over here. Here, I'll be sticking to writing related topics. I will, at least for the time being, keep the manga widget, but it might eventually be replaced with books I recommend reading and why. Eventually.
Total Miles Hiked: 7.4
I’m watching the trial of Anders Breivik via my twitter feed and a couple of disturbing trends are appearing. I think we can all agree that no matter what your political beliefs, you have instantly lost whatever argument you hoped to form when you started shooting children. Lest we forget, our Freemason friend of freedom was quite happy to slaughter innocent members of public minding their own business in the centre of Oslo – for the “greater good”.
Makes approximately 1 1/2 quarts gelato.
*Post the project on your blog and any other online galleries to which you might belong
Below: the new Produce Exchange
Unforgiven
So, I've had a rough time of it since being home, but I have reached some important decisions. One of them being that I will be starting another blog, in addition to this one, that deals with my childhood abuse , the effects from it, and all that I've learned. I have also decided to take some action against my abuser, which I've been wanting to do for a long time.
Your will, Your glory
Raunch the hell out with Philadelphia’s Birds of Maya on their ultra jam of the ultra Bobby “The Music Never Stopped”
Instead of being fired, suspended, hung by the thumbs, forced to wash her mouth out with a sponsor's soap on air, whatever punishment fits the crime, the management of the flagship station of the NBC network gave its sinner a big fat promotion. She is being moved from the Siberia of local news -- the five o'clock news show -- to co-anchor of the 6 PM broadcast with Chuck Scarborough, the Cadillac of Big Apple newscasts.
PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE (1959) first colorized and in 3-D at the San Jose Rep as part of Cinequest, then in black and white 2-D at the Roxie to end Not Necessarily Noir II. The first time was in fact the world premiere of the 3-D version, and I was there dressed as Vampira (it wasn't pretty, and no I don't have pictures). The second time was with Johnny Legend presenting a whole Ed Wood tribute (including GLEN OR GLENDA, which also could've made this list). I'm pretty sure there wasn't anything all that honorable about either screening, but damn it was fun.
As some of you witty people may notice I took my title from Jimmy Bufffet because I thought that was completely appropriate for my life in the past weeks. I have been lying in the sun doing nothing for the past 20 days or so. I have been spending so much time outside that I have not been around to write on blog. Sometimes I love writing this and other times it feels like a chore so I have been avoiding it. Today I felt led to update my family and friends on my life. Apparently people keep asking my family members how I am and they are having trouble coming up with an answer due to my lack of communication...well here is my apology...I am sorry I have been busy doing nothing! haha Anyway rather than tell you what I did each day which is practically nothing worth retelling I will just show you pictures and tell you about the memorable things. So here we go back in time..to April. As I mentioned in the last blog when I left you I was starting a two week break from class and had no plans. One of my friends from America, Ashley, was leaving on the 24th so we had a surprise birthday dinner for her. She was so excited and grateful...here is a photo. By the way it was a "potluck" dinner amongst exchange college students...you cannot even imagine the weird food people brought but nevertheless it was nice.
Do we have plans?
It's a lot easier to pull out a bag when you need masking tape then to sift through a drawer of junk looking for it.
it does not matter how good my reasons are for each suggestion, or how qualified I am to make these recommendations, because I can absolutely guarantee an endless number of critics on the internet, at REI, or at your local gun store advising you of just the opposite of what I have said, on each and every point, and claiming far greater expertise on these matters. It is even likely some will respond critically to this post here on ZH in the comments below. However, I believe that an average plan that is well implemented is usually better than a great plan that is never implemented.
And do I love the written word! Words dance, they twine around each other, create beautiful images, patterns, forms. Words have souls.
“And this is something we haven’t experienced in the 64 years of Israel’s independence,” he said.
It's a special pleasure to have friend, super-cinephile, and editorial comrade Adrian Martin visit me in Buffalo for a few days this week. I'm enjoying every minute of the non-stop movie talk. Adrian and I will head to Northwestern University in Chicago later in the week for a panel discussion on "film criticism and its relationship to academia." — G.
Before she had arrived at the event the Girls Aloud star tweeted about being nervous: “How can I still be nervous about red carpets after 10 (sic) years.. Eeek!”
What being the only living member of the band you mean? It's got novelty value at least. No, no.
(9) The New Federalist party directed massive fund into science and engineering. Opponents criticized heir methods for raising the necessary funds as tyrannical. Widespread protests denounced as uncaring and brutal their educational reforms, designed to produce citizens with strong reading and mathematical skills. Few of their investments produced commercial products. But the successes included the reactionless drive — which gave America the lead in space development it retains to this day (see the entry on terraforming Mars). And Project Forbin, the first artificial intelligence — which led to the late 21st century breakthroughs that created our world of today.
Kay Rice
Anyway, today I made chocolate-chip orange muffins from Joie Warner's All the Best Muffins and Quickbreads. I thought I'd posted the recipe on this blog before but damned if I can find it, and I'm too lazy to type it out tonight! Suffice to say, they were very tasty, and a good excuse to eat chocolate in the morning.
Dreams, visions and promise will remain bound until unlocked by intentional choices (not to be confused with moving in the arm of flesh) but at the same time they are not gotten by direct pursuit, rather a bi-product of the greatest pursuit and a life laid down.
We pass a military train loaded with soldiers and military equipment. We are now only 150 k from the Pakistan border. We arrive at Jaisalmer. It has been raining. We load our bags into bajajs and drive to the Jaisalmer Fort. Our hotel, the Deepak Rest House, is located within the fort. I have a room to myself. Lunch on the roof-top restaurant. At 1500 we meet for an orientation walk around the narrow streets avoiding motor bikes. Beautiful vistas of the valley below and beyond into the desert.
2. You do not comprehend just about everything that relates to legal issues of the land.
I was looking for my husband at the finish line. He’s what really kept me running. I don’t care that I was running super slow, I was running.
The beads of sweat on your forehead have evaporated and have turned into salty white trails and the clams that once laid nervously in your palms have shut tight and buried themselves deep away under your skin. As the lone story-teller in the interview asks you if there are any questions and as you ask your logical question the story continues with an enigmatic answer to your question. Wait what was that? A joke or actually a crass realization of intelligence of progress slithers from the intimidating bald gent and as laughter fills the room your body releases its tight grip of stress and you slouch in relief, as you now realize that even though your answers were muted and hidden behind a repetitive story, they were still heard by the other audiences in the room. As you all rise to commemorate the end of this long journey down memory lane, you are relaxed and confidently stroll out of the building thinking to yourself… “During an interview sometimes it is not what you say that gets you the job, it is the muting of your ideologies and own experiences conversely the opening of your mind to what story is being relayed that does the trick.”
So how does it taste? I cut my dragon fruit into pieces…
Your friendship through this process has made me realize that though there may be a few who are out to tear down and destroy-- the majority of people are kind hearted, loving, and supportive.
My Mom and sisters are working hard on my baby shower. It is going to be on July 8th and they got together on Sunday to do some planning. I just have to get them a list of my friends to invite, which I'm working on. It's so surreal that I might get to have a baby shower! Ted and I went to Babies r us to register last night, another surreal moment and a fun one. I had a great time at babies r us but when I got home I was really emotional and cried upstairs for awhile....because we never got to do it with Jacob I think....then I cried because I felt guilty about crying. If Jacob had lived, we wouldn't have done the registry for Boh since I wouldn't have had another baby shower. Then I was mad at myself because I'm pregnant and she is doing well and I have so much to be grateful for and there I was crying. Oh the circles of joy and sorrow and guilt.
I hope I have inspired you and given you some ideas on how best to keep your beloved donkey, horse or mule in optimum health and at a healthy weight for 2012. Comments and suggestions help others so please keep them coming.
This war in Libya has been on going for 6 months.
The date marks the end of almost two years of ferocious civil war and foreign occupation in Italy, as the collapse of fascism turned the country into a battleground between the Allies, advancing upwards from Sicily, and the Nazi Germans who occupied Italy in September 1943 to prop up Mussolini’s dying regime. While Rome was liberated by the Allies in June 1944, the tug of war continued in northern and central Italy for almost another year. Numerous groups of resistance fighters, la Resistenza, dominated by the Italian communists, were formed in the occupied areas, and the German and fascist position was gradually weakened by guerrilla warfare, in preparation for the long awaited Allied surge. Finally, 25 April 1945 was decided on as the Italian ‘D-Day’. A mass popular uprising was to take place across the northern Italy, to prepare the ground for the Allies. Mass strikes paralysed the industrial cities of Milan and Turin, destroying what little authority the fascists still retained, and days of street fighting forced the Germans into retreat. Many towns and cities were already out of German and fascist hands by the time the Allies arrived to ‘liberate’ them.
"I'd still like to know what that means, but the answer is no. The ones who reject the truth go to oblivion. After they get their second chance, if they still reject it, they stay in oblivion."
The Surrey New York has been redefining Upper East Side elegance. Whimsical touches like marble “rugs” tiled into the floor and snippets of poetry scrawled across cushions enhance the feeling that The Surrey New York is somewhere special. With an enviable address on 76th at Madison, The Surrey New York is a few minutes from Gracie Mansion and famed Museum Mile. Home to celebrated treasure troves like the Guggenheim, the Frick Collection, and the Metropolitan Museum of Art, guests will have a plethora of choices when staying at The Surrey New York.
If you figure out what gets readers engaged, then you can post more often. If the Edgerank is low, you have to network to get it higher. Start talking about really great posts in networking groups you're a part of. Only share the really good ones, not all of them. Ask them to share your FB posts with their community and vice versa. There's a fine line between cheating and not, networking where it makes sense it not cheating but gets people aware of your page.
The security tag on any bottle of wine above $12.
"Burger King has been accused of pushing racial stereotypes in its new ad campaign, which features movie and pop stars eating in Burger King restaurants.
The show ends as we’re informed that Bonnie was convicted on the murder charge and paid the ultimate penalty. The whole episode was a bore.
She likes him well enough. Keeta is a little weird, but then again, so is Danni, so she doesn’t mind. His eyes don’t wander the way other boys’ do. Danni isn’t sure what to make of that, but it does seem strange to her that he never… well, looks at her. He must just not like her very much. She simply can’t imagine any other reason.
and they make me weep!
You are home alone and see someone attempting to pry open the window of your house. Do you:
- Try to find pieces that aren't super heavy. Cheaper quality dishes seemed to be lighter. You don't want the whole thing to be top-heavy.
Traditions cannot be transplanted. Just because a Protestant church finds great vibrancy and edification in Pentecostal rock music does not mean that a Catholic parish will likewise be edified. A salt water fish can't live in fresh water. The crops that thrive in Cuba wither in Norway because the environment is different. The only difference between these examples and what we have today in the Catholic Church is that it only takes the green-thumb farmer one trial and one error to realize that tropical crops cannot flourish in cold climates; how many decades will it take for our liturgists to learn the same simple lesson?
Setting up a blog tour is easy, though time-consuming. You need to research blogs to find the best fit, and then you need to query the blogger. If you are invited to be a guest on the blog, you need to find out what is expected of you — an article, an interview, a giveaway — and you need make sure that every article you write, every response in an interview is different and appealing.
Carried Orders Since before end of day 09/30/2011, still outstanding as of end of day 10/31/2011
But despite the ever present problem novel and the current vogue for dystopic fiction (not even mentioned in the article), a majority of teen fiction does not fall in the "dark" but "light" category. After all, many readers, especially avid ones in my experience, read books for the fun escape, and these dark, hard-hitting books are not exactly "fun". They can be moving, gut-wrenching, or chilling, but they are rarely "fun". So, I have compiled a list of some of my favorite teen books that are fabulous reads about utterly frivolous subjects.
Three Times a Lady
Government approval of the idea that that health and safety assessment has been getting in the way of business is the wrong message to be sending out a time when businesses are cutting back to deal with the financial effects of the recession. A recent survey of 600 heath and safety professionals found that the economic climate has already taken its toll on the safety sector. With 41% seeing their budget cut this year, and nearly half (45%) claiming that their company ‘did not see health and safety as business critical’ during a recession.
tell me now
Pages four and five cover section one of the rules. Whats section one you ask? The introduction, including stuff like dice notation and other useful things. For any of you out there planning to make a rules book like this don't skimp on it. What you may take as common knowledge might not be as common as you think.
They come to see; they come to be
“Cats are problematic because you can’t see them and they threaten bird nests and small native animals,” she said.
This is how Mpumalanga traffic "officers" bragged after they seriously assaulted the 42 year old farmer from Grootvlei.
15. Burn Bridges
Parks, Cara. “What’s Going On In Egypt?” Breaking News and Opinion on The Huffington Post. Huffington Post, 28 Jan. 2011. Web. 19 Feb. 2012. .">.
“When it happened it was my first year as head coach,” says Steve. “When I first saw him in the hospital, he had lost four pints of blood, then four more the next time. I realized if people hadn’t given blood, he wouldn’t be here.”
Chop the shallots, onion, red pepper, garlic, chili and coriander stalks. Heat oil in a pan and sweat the onions and pepper. Add the garlic, chili and coriander stalks. Sweat some more, then add the content of the tomato tins, vinegar, sugar, salt and other spices. Simmer for about 15 minutes so the excess moisture can evaporate and the sauce thickens. Now make a little space for the eggs in the sauce so they can be enclosed, drop the eggs in and simmer some more to poach the eggs. Sprinkle with chopped coriander and squeeze some fresh lime on top. Serve with warm tortilla bread and sour cream.
At least cereal is fortified here, so I'm pretty sure it's giving me all the nutrition I need. :)
For refusal to let go
When Eugene remarried in 1874, he moved Eugene, Jr. into this house. Later it was occupied by John, Jr.’s daughter Hallie Bremond Houston and her husband.
The voice is very forceful; that appeals to me. I also like that we've got a sense of the stakes and a sense of the choice Hope has to make.
What an asshole! First, Isaac Hayes leaves the show because wah wah, they made fun of Scientology. Shaft? More like daft.
2 pause
Me: What things?
Season ground beef with pepper. Add salsa to meat mixture and combine. Shape into patties. Grill to desired doneness. While burger is grilling, spread bottom of whole wheat bun with yogurt and top with radicchio leaves. Spread a generous amount of guacamole on top bun. Add hot, grilled burger and enjoy.
Elton John – “Goodbye Yellow Brick Road” (MCA)
that you should enter under my roof,
Before Chris could answer, Dee and Mandy returned to the game room and headed straight for the picture they’d been studying. Mandy lifted it from its hook and carried it to the kitchen where she placed it on the island. As they talked, Justin and Alyssa returned with the dog, removed its leash, and headed through the sliding glass doors for the backyard. Chief curled up on the sunroom sofa and waited to be chased off, but the grown ups were too distracted from alcohol and history.
—Aunt Nancy and the Bothersome Visitors by Phyllis Root, illustrated by David Parkins—I first came across a satisfying single book called Aunt Nancy and Old Man Trouble, in which our heroine uses reverse psychology to get rid of bad luck personified, but this volume includes three other stories. The illustrations are especially good. Note that "Aunt Nancy" is a Southern American folk character derived from the West African spider trickster, Anansi.
Brodhead’s discussion of the paper was nothing short of stunning. After an almost apologetic defense of the principle of academic freedom as applied to faculty research, the president all but seethed with rage when discussing the paper: “I can see why students took offense at what was reported of a professor's work. Generalizations about academic choices by racial category can renew the primal insult of the world we are trying to leave behind—the implication that persons can be known through a group identity that associates them with inferior powers. A further insult was that the paper had been included in an amicus brief submitted by opponents of affirmative action urging the Supreme Court to hear the case I mentioned earlier regarding admissions policies at the University of Texas.”
Last, but not least, are the Deli Dogs. This is an arbitrary label that we have chosen to convey the fact that while these dogs MAY be available nationwide, they are generally sold in channels that are related to the distribution of food service deli meat products which can be either regional or nationwide, depending on the success of that brand. Hebrew National and Oscar Meyer started out that way, but have long since transcended into such mass-produced mainstream products and packaging and these so-called Deli Dogs may be headed that way, but in our opinion were not yet there, since their target market seems to be on deli counters and deli-meat products for food service use.
You’ll want this one, it’s delicious and would be GREAT for summery picnics. Or to eat on your sofa watching Mad Men, whichever.
Mr. Jenny kept trying to reassure me that I never looked stupid and freaky, with our without purple glasses with rhinestones, but I know he was just saying that...
Last November, the long-awaited lawsuit finally appeared online. It was filed in the Southern District Court of New York.
I still have his tape player, and in the player is one of his tapes. If I rewind the tape a bit, I’ll be able to listen to the last song he ever heard. That’s something else I haven’t been able to do, or wanted to do. I don’t know how I’ll feel. Don’t know if it will make me feel connected to him, if it will set off a storm of tears, or if I will feel as if I were spying on him. So the tape player with that final tape is packed away, along with all his other tapes except the one on my table with it’s stark reminder: whole thing flawed.
cabbage isn't generally something i cook with a lot. but the
Now, I was also planning on hanging some artwork to complete this bed wall project. Remember the mockup I drew last week?
Administrative & Support Services
The first third or so of the 25 miles back was miserable. The drizzle was annoying, but not that bad, and my tires had good traction on the wet road. What killed me was that this entire part was uphill. Plus, the wind was in my face or coming across me the entire time. At one point, I decided to was safer to walk to bike for a while, but even holding the bike up was difficult against the cross wind.
General Thanksgiving
Read this article in the news and my first thought: Where are we going to have our quick weekday dinners from now on? These eateries are a short walk away from where we live and we usually da bao fried rice/mee goreng from House of Seafood @180 and dine at 8 Degree Taiwanese Bistro down the road. We enjoy heading to 8 Degree because their outdoor seats allow Moon to come along. They’ve only opened last year and we eat there at least twice a month.
horses vent into the still air,
See more in video.
And no driving until next week. Ho hum....it would be great for the drinkfest planned after work tomorrow, except they say that alcohol and high concentrations of acetaminophen (as in Percocet or Tylenol 3) will practically make your liver dissolve inside your body. So I get to play it dry, if not loopy from the medicine. What better way to celebrate the 30-year anniversary for a woman at work, who's a big Brett Favre fan, than to get doped up on painkillers, right?
Many are loathe to think that their government would have the brashness to mislead, lie to, or conceal information from the public whom they profess to serve. The notion that governments routinely misinform the public to keep them in the dark is the most basic premise which separates "main-streamers" from "conspiracy theorists". It's getting more and more difficult, however, for the "main-streamers" to prop up their flimsy idyllic and naive reality once whistle-blowers like Ken Johnston come forward. Ken is a former National Aeronautics and Space Administration Data and Photo Control Department manager. He recently announced that NASA has been covering up ancient alien cities and the remains of amazingly advanced machinery on the moon for well over 40 years. He also indicated that the agency ordered a cover-up and forced him to participate in it and then let him go once he came forward to blow the whistle on the veil of secrecy.
Grifter’s Hymnal ends with what sounds like an actual hymn. “Ask God,” featuring some devilish Coricidin slide and sounding like some long lost Blind Willie Johnson song, is built around some simple spiritual advice: “When darkness swoops down on you, ask God for some light. ... When some devil knocks you down, ask God to pick you up. ... When death comes a knocking, ask God to open the door.”
Below I posted photos of the Stampin' Up! designer series paper and buttons that I used to make my fall wreath. The designer series paper and buttons are both available in our current holiday mini catalog. I also use some neutral buttons and 1 1/4" grosgrain ribbon which are both available in our idea book and catalog.
Fore a few brief months the journals spoke with a great and unprecedented rage that neither arrest nor exile could silence. At first their approach was oblique, their allusions veiled, and they often fell victim to the censor’s pencil. But people had suffered censorship for too long. Satirist constantly expanded their territory and their targets of attack, demolishing one obstacle after another as they went, thriving on censorship. The workers’ movement grew in boldness, culminating in the birth of the St Petersburg Soviet of Workers’ Deputies, the people’s government. For fifty days the Tsar and his ministers were confronted by another power, another law. Journalist and printers seized the right to publish without submitting to the censor. The satirical journals then reached their apotheosis, until the revolution died as it had risen, bathed in blood.
A homophone is a word that sounds like ("phone") another word but means something different: To, two, too.
Venison Cooked In Espresso Oil (Smoked Celery Root, Persimmon, Mugolio Jus)
Summer Volidays is a project run by Sheffield Volunteering, in which charities receive a team of Sheffield University and Student’s Union staff members and a small piece of funding in order to complete a task that would make a big difference to them. They are looking for activities that can be finished in one day, that don’t require any previous experience and that cater for a variety of abilities ( please note that they don’t recruit for fundraising activities). Charities will need to supervise the activity on the day and organise lunch for the volunteers (although funding is available for purchasing lunch). Reasonable expenses up to a maximum of £400 per organisation can be paid.
There was also two panel discussions.
We are not responsible for how people are to respond, but we are responsible for making sure they have a chance too respond.
So in my usual quirky self, I ask if she was..."Dusty Lulu?!?!?" And sure enough, it was!!! Oh she is just the most darling & sweetest person! I tell her that I'm a fan of her blog and we chit-chat and laugh away! I love it when I get to meet another fellow blogger in person! :)
And finally my newest experiment. I've knitted since I was in high school, but never tried socks. It seems to be the upcoming thing. I have a friend, Tammie, who brings her latest knitty project to Tuesday stitching. So this is the first sock. I have made more progress since this photo. I'm ready to start turning the heel. Kinda fun. Hope they fit my fat legs.
Dull, bull, and George ate late.
Me screaming here. I just feel so insane right now.
I saw the best movie of all time... well, not sure if it is the best, I need to go see it again, hopefully in IMAX.
It will always be delivered in Word format, but you will need Excel spreadsheets to calculate the analyses for your financial plan.
It's always nice to be recognized by our peers. In accordance with accepting the award I am answering the following questions and then passing the award along to others:
I learned a little bit about cartomancy by doing this reading; I hope you did too.
My actual birthday is April 15th and on that day the Magic Kingdom will be open until three in the morning for Extra Magic Hours! I don't think I can get my mom to go that long but hopefully we'll get to enjoy a good amount of nighttime at Magic Kingdom.
We pay the same or more for the same products as we did a few years ago when those products were made in North America or even Europe. Manufacturing jobs vanished as corporations hauled their production to countries where wages are pennies compared to dollars. Corporations are doing great as a result of these and other tactics aimed at maximizing income and pleasing their shareholders.
It is understood the gang arrived at the complex on Thursday morning in a car with Telkom signs on it. They produced a phone account bearing the family's name and told the security guard they were there to fix the line. The guard called the unit, spoke to one of the two domestic workers and was assured that the technicians were expected.
463. Dinner @ Publican (Chicago, IL) 6pm
Flannelboard: When You’re Going to the Moon. This wonderful idea came from Mel’s Desk. To go along with it, we sang “When You’re Going to the Moon” to the tune of “If You’re Happy and You Know It.” Pre-K especially loved this activity. Thanks, Mel’s Desk!
This is the second part in a brief series on Joshua Thurow’s article:
In tones distinct and clear,
But mostly he wanted you, Sheila,
junit4
* pain and stiffness in spine
How can one set of letters have so many different pronunciations? It just does, that’s all! A novelist’s only defense is to study, learn, and remain ever diligent!
- Same results as obtained using EAC
Across the African continent millions of Christians were inspired to participate in the process of transforming Africa. 77 South African regions and 27 African countries committed to a Day of Repentance and Prayer for Africa on the 1st of May 2003.
I am thankful for that little slice of time that brought me so much joy! Not only did I find peace and pleasure in doing something so simple, but we had an easy and delicious dinner and will no doubt enjoy the homemade snacks in the coming days. In fact, I am sitting here with a cup of hot coffee and a yummy oatmeal cookie as I write this post!
Here are the posts you must anticipate for the coming days… sit back, and order your bottomless iced tea!
Yeah, if there’s one thing I associate with Bobby Petrino, it’s memorable catch phrases.
It was not clear if Garrison had consumed all of the drinks.
Check out her beautiful card below!
I already adore June and it's only day 1! Have a great month!
PRINTED responses will be collected on Thursday.
Dependency checking failed.
For a start, when we took in Angela and her husband during the xenophobic violence, Pecksniff was livid. She informed Angela that she couldn’t stay with us. I phoned her and explained that Angela’s life was in danger and as a basic act of humanity the least I could do was offer her sanctuary. I said to Pecksniff that I hoped if I ever found myself in Angela’s situation that Pecksniff might be willing to offer me refuge… She said she took my point but she still didn’t like it as it undermined her position as employer.
- add a small amount of lip-safe, colored mica for a tinted lip balm
I wish I could make you
In Mr. Helm’s drumming, muscle, swing, economy and finesse were inseparably merged. His voice held the bluesy, weathered and resilient essence of his Arkansas upbringing in the Mississippi Delta.
So, here’s a radical thought: maybe you don’t need to lose a few pounds, or that beauty or stretch mark, or pay $30 for new lip plumping cream.
This whole meal was really delicious. I have a new found love for quinoa, and guess who else does as well? Pat! I didn't tell him how good it was for him until after he tasted it, I didn't want that to taint his judgment (I think in his mind he assumes healthy grains=cardboard taste). The chicken was really good - very moist. I love goat cheese and the combination of goat cheese and spinach (with a squeeze of lemon) was great, although the flavor didn't really jump out at you. I had considered adding other spices to the filling but didn't because of the marinade I used for the asparagus (I didn't want it to be flavor overload). If I made this chicken again with subtler vegetables, I'd trying adding some/all of the following to the chicken stuffing: roasted garlic, red pepper flakes, artichoke hearts, rosemary and thyme, caramelized onions. I'm sure there's lots of great things that could go in these! Pat was very happy for a home cooked meal (that didn't involve tofu) and I really enjoyed it, too.
Smitten Kitchen mentions that this recipe makes 9 to 10 muffins. We ended up making 12. I prefer them smaller. The total baking time was the same though.
Well, I searched the web, but couldn't find any free "Repair Tag" clip art, so I decided to make my own based on the tag I had.
Confession: I really do not like to bake. I don't know why either, and it actually baffles me since I love to cook so much. So I am spreading my wings and am trying my hand at coming up with my own recipe for whole wheat rolls/buns since I can't find a recipe I like or any store-bought that meet my strict criteria! ;) You may recall me talking in previous posts about nixing wheat/gluten around here, but my husband is undergoing testing next month for gluten-related issues, so I actually have to make sure he is getting gluten in his diet until then, thus sending me on what is turning out to be a baking frenzy.
I didn't want to leave the hotel, I just wanted to stay there. but we had beer to drink, food to eat and friends to hang out with, so I reluctantly left our amazing crib and wandered out and about Prague.
Neither Amazon nor Barnes & Noble will divulge the algorithms they use for rankings. What Amazon will say is that sales rankings are updated hourly for millions of items. The sales history counts, but recent sales are weighted more heavily. I think I have clearly voiced my disinterest before in these best selling lists and such. Oh, they are fun to look at, but when it comes to buying or reading, give me a good review or recommendation from someone I trust any day. In fact, if something is very, very popular (in the past, insert any Oprah pick here), that is a bit of a red flag for me. I can't say that I believe I have ever read a book just because it was on one of these list...and I know that I have NEVER bought a book on Amazon because of it's ranking. So authors, don't be distracted and besides, they are probably 'fixed' somehow anyhoo. Just write really good, entertaining stuff and then get some great reviews out there. Personally, I think it is worth a lot more than some questionable ranking somewhere.
"Damn that bitch! When SHE was pregnant I only charged her husband fifty!"
Today, we had another crazy thing happen. We met the Mayor of Macerata! Now if anything makes me have a big head, it is being treated like a dignitary everywhere we go! We listened to his speech about the beauties of the area, the wonderful things to do and to bring back with us. Then we posed for a picture that would be in the local newspaper. How crazy is that?! Anyways, after this we had the rest of the day to do whatever.
I like to stroll along what is left of the Venice canals. Perhaps someone doesn't know that this marshy area was reclaimed at the beginning of the XX century by Mr. Abbot Kinney, almost only mentioned as a tobacco magnate while in fact he did several things, including extensively travelling at the end of the nineteenth century and learning 6 languages. He was enchanted by the Italian Venice and wished to recreate its magic in an amusement park: there were restaurants, an aquarium, a ball room, a miniature railroad and most of all gondolas and gondoliers imported from Venice.
FarmSlut “It was really good.”
I have some exciting news to share today. I have been nominated for the 2011 Most Fascinating Teaching Blog. I would love if everyone would take the time to vote for me. The voting begins on January 21st at 12:01 am.
I love the new orientation of the room, but the obvious question is "How the heck do I dress that window behind the bed?". It certainly needs something. The sloped wall presents a bit of a challenge. I have an idea how I could address it, but I'd love to hear your thoughts before I do anything.
The main roads leading to cemeteries in Batu Lancang, Batu Gantong, Mount Erskine and Paya Terubong saw a bumper-to-bumper crawl.
His demeanor changed. He relaxed. His tone was softer.
So, methinks I'm off to the bookstore tomorrow to remedy my little situation. Once a nerd, always a nerd.
What are you loving these days?
If you're lucky to go to another tent, you'll see alot of cooking team, and some have bbq catered. You will find that alcohol basically freely flowing. And as the night goes, who cares about the food... there's beer. I can see how people can hang there all night and every tent has their own security, armed or not. That was kinda interesting, but don't get lost!
Animation
This one is mercifully simple. Lets say Pisces is rising. So the lord of the first house is Jupiter. If Jupiter is in a good house, this is a positive factor. It means the First House will be positive – you will have a good body and good material success.If on the other hand Jupiter is in a bad house, it is a negative indication – you will not be so pretty or sound in body and will lack in material success.
I am please to announce that Ang (DT Leader) is going to be participating in our challenges again, we haven't seen her post for a while but she has been working away in the background to ensure that we have plenty of fantastic sponsors and themes for our challenges.
My sister-in-law, Valerie, is the wonderful saint who introduced me to this salad. And, yes, I consider this a salad - a side dish. Some people consider it a dessert. But no, no, not me. I happily eat this right along with my main dish. FAB-U-LOUS!!!
What did you think of The Blue Handbag?
Future generations of e-books will likely be more interactive and therefore distracting. I have already viewed some animated children's books. I want a book, not a smart phone.
So I'm making a note of it on the calendar, these darker days, and when Aunt Flow shows up. And next month, if it happens again, I'll know there's a connection.
It was a shock to all of us when Clark suffered a stroke in 2004. His first year back on New Year’s Rockin’ Eve was heartbreaking but courageous. He had really made a statement for coping with disabilities with grace and dignity. I always winced the subsequent years seeing him on the show because I feared that’s how people were going to remember him. Please don’t.
* 2 cups heavy whipping cream
I revel in Your ever-lasting love
I responded with a polite version of #2. Her response to that was something along the lines of "All of our decisions affect our children's futures."
1 seemingly
Our Fair Use Policy (FUP) helps us do this and also means we don’t have to charge any run on rates. We will never ask you to pay more than you agreed, so you’ll always know how much you’re paying and never get an unexpected bill.
Humbled by what he’s done
Do you have something you've been wanting to do and just haven't found or made the time? What is it? Maybe we can encourage and remind one another to take time for something we enjoy doing!
In 1944, Elsie Schmidt accompanies a German officer to an official Nazi party given on Christmas Eve in Garmisch, Germany during World War II. Elsie, a baker’s daughter is a bundle of nerves yet lighthearted as her date, Herr Josef Hubb arrives. Many surprises greet Elsie at the party. She is accosted by drunk and vile officer with lascivious intentions. Fortunately she is saved when a young boy who had just finished singing for the Germans interrupts the crime. The boy’s name is Tobias, a Jew. Also during the evening Josef stuns Elsie with a marriage proposal and presents her with an exquisite engagement ring. Josef will have to wait for Elsie’s answer. She becomes suspicious and curious when she discovers some barely visible Hebrew letters nearly etched away on the inside band. She has heard stories about camps and confiscation of property, but would Josef be involved? Later in the evening she is surprised again when Tobias arrives at her back door, he has escaped. With no time to spare, Elsie decides to hide the boy, even though the risk of death at the hands of the ruthless Gestapo is chilling.
The wooden birdhouse came from Michaels. First I base coated the birdhouse with acrylic paint - pink for the roof, green for the base, and white for the walls - and then I traced the parts of the birdhouse to make patterns for cutting the patterned paper. The scallops on the roof were a little harder than I thought they'd be, since each side and each row was slightly different. I used Mod Podge to adhere the papers to the wooden birdhouse and then coated the entire project with Mod Podge as a sealer.
Normally, I ignore him. Or I get down on his level and talk about choices and opportunities and responsibilities and all that. But I was tired, too. I just didn't want to go all Mommy on him.
Kristín Björk Kristjánsdóttir and 5 others, Kira Kira, frontlady in a wonderland made of mandoline, laptop, trombone, guitars and drums.
She labelled the Zuma motorcade incident as "pure and utter banana-republic power abuse".
And how long and well it stood confronting death.
In my world, there are four types of outpatient clinic:
Chivalry really isn’t dead. Who knew? I work for a commercial real estate firm. These guys don’t like to get their hands dirty and think the world should bow and cater to them. How shocked was I when the loading dock guys, did things like hold the elevator, hold a door, help me carry items without me having to beg and plead. It was like another dimension, bizarro world! I almost didn’t know how to act!
Kai hyung says i am scary when i pretend to talk to myself and speak to him informally. (D.O: Isn’t it one of your cute charms?). He says I do it on purpose but we all end up joking about it. Euhahaha (Kai: He sometimes puts his arms around the hyungs’ shoulders and ask in informal speech “Is it tasty?” / Chanyeol : But he also shows his aegyo and goes “ppuing ppuing” too so it’s okay)
3.) Two of my favourite authors are Henning Mankell and Haruki Murakami. They, in my humble opinion, are master storytellers.
He yells
I'm very philosophical about my age though. I have no desperate urge to live to a hundred. I don't see that as a dazzling achievement. And as for living beyond thirty, well, I'm profoundly grateful I met Jenny at the age of 34, naturally. But if I'd snuffed it in my twenties and skipped a few decades, so what? I'd never have met Jenny, but then, what you've never had, you never miss, as they say.
Its a strange feeling being 21. It's actually starting to hit me that I really don't have any more restrictions in terms of where I can go and what I can do. This weekend in Sf I'm actually going to a dance club, which I'm really excited about. I've been to a club but that was in BC, Canada where the drinking age is 19. So as lame as it sounds this will be my first American club!
Your character keeps running in a direct line, and you have to steer the character to the goal. Essentially, you do this by waving the Wii pointers and drag it to create a vine for your character to run along. It’s simple yet effective, as all the stages gradually climb an incline of difficulty, starting off with simple obstacles and eventually turning into roaming baddies and moving boulders, and generally stuff like that.
Wyrobek AJ, Schrader SM, Perreault SD, Fenster L, Huszar G, Katz DF, et al. Assessment of reproductive disorders and birth defects in communities near hazardous chemical sites. III. Guidelines for field studies of male reproductive disorders. Reprod Toxicol 1997; 11: 243-259.
I'm also taking Spanish III at the community college. I've come to the conclusion that I. Don't. Speak. Spanish. and apparently no amount of book-learnin' is going to help me. ;-) But I'm still hanging in there.
I'm just at that happy point of reading right now where I'm not getting impatient with my books (Must read more! Faster! NOW!) but nor am I getting bogged down, or struggling to engage with them. In fact, if I can only keep my reading mojo at this perfect level, this summer's madcap holiday period could be a smooth ride indeed - I'll just stick my nose in a book and not come out until it's over! :)
After reading these news reports, I quickly understood that Brooks had not acted alone. In fact, it was a narrow-minded society that provided ammunition for this crime. It was only the gay community that stood strong and honestly told the truth about these murders. They loudly proclaimed that this double homicide was not a neighborhood feud but a hate crime. As a continued tribute to the gay community, I am honored at Marianne K. Martin’s request to write the forward of her latest novel, The Indelible Heart. This novel extends some of the plot threads related to my mother and Christine that appeared in Martin’s first novel Love in Balance and succeeds in giving a personal face to the events surrounding the murders. Though it is a work of fiction, the narrative highlights how in fact, the gay community rallied together to fight homophobia and violence in response to this shocking crime. I encourage people to read this profoundly moving novel and realize that it is our duty as members of society to stand together and continue a united struggle against intolerance and violence.
Nigel Hawthorne (The Madness of King George)
Woah, that’s crap-loads! That is so cool!
It is really hard to focus on the details when your whole atmosphere is alive with the collective voice of God. But I am a trooper (smile.) This heavenly sound was being sung all around her, but there seemed to be… hmmmmmm… geez, words, ya know? I want to say a purpose, but that is so not the right word. The sound was so encompassing around her and seemed to have movement… I noticed there was this interesting wispy like, soft white vortex that was surrounding the ladder her body was standing on. This vortex energy was housed very close to the ladder itself, maybe a space of a foot was between the ladder itself and the wispy vortex.
war and the recession in 2007 and no one
How do you live with yourselves knowing that you could have saved the lives of at least some of the people listed below, and many other dead victims who are not listed here, as well as preventing thousands more from receiving serious injuries?
When we arrived in the kitchen, service for the evening was underway. Everything seemed very much under control – the kitchen was spotless, and the other chefs were working calmly and efficiently. Mattias told us that in the past he’s been a bit more hot-headed (think Gordon Ramsay!) but now he’s calmer, and although he will occasionally shout at his team, he saves it for when it’s really needed – much more scary if you ask me (although I find it hard to imagine Mattias being scary at all)!
Don't step on the ducks!'
Love Hate Heartbreak
Can scarcely be expressed!
In short, this evening was an absolute blast. We had a second guitarist and a saxophonist. The latter played with Townes Van Zandt back when Mickey played with him, and despite the fact that this gig WAS our rehearsal, it all came off very strong.
You wait in the aisle pretending to look for a sweet
Let there come an end
Little Rug Bug by NRBQ
"HOLY SHIT THAT IS COMPLETELY RIDICULOUS! I AGREE!" (sorry mom)
-- like this.
The TRC was right to examine all these issues. It was also right to condemn these violations and their perpetrators. The fact that it condemned political organisations across the spectrum suggests, too, that it was even-handed in the way it did its work.
“You would think me mad! Madder than you do now, anyhow. I have few secrets left in this world, and I would keep but one from you. I have little else left.”
MY thought is that Baby C is overtired, too, since he hasn't made up for the sleep he is losing at night. So I am dedicated to getting him to take a nap this afternoon. He took a typically short one this morning but it is clearly not enough. The book said that it can take as long as an hour the first time that you try to get them to self-soothe by checking on them every 5 minutes or so. I am willing to try that.
This is good. It's not the most gripping opening, but it's good enough to keep me reading. Agents don't really keep score cards when reading queries. There are a couple things that will get you an instant rejection (fiction novel) but mostly we read till we know whether we want to read the pages.
On a future man of the village
Next was a view which seperated the Holy Place from the Holy of Holies. This veil was about eighteen inches thick, which made it practically untearable by any human source. It hid the cohen from the presence of God, who was in the Holy of Holies.
I"ve been seriously neglecting this little blog, and for that I apologize, but I come bearing goodies :) About a year ago I put together a little "dry erase" binder for L-Pad, and he wasn't really big on it so it just sat there with only dust as company. But this last week he's gotten more and more into the "coloring" and file folder games. So I'm putting together something awesome with pencil pouches and TON of printables to exchange out whenever he starts getting bored with the same stuff. I'm doing both LDS material and preschool stuff. I got some of the LDS stuff from Green Jello with Carrots and then my eternal families FFG over on my LDS blog and then some coloring activities. I would definately include some stuff from the Friend Magazine, however with L-Pad's language delay, they frustrate him immensely so until we get a better hang on them I'm not including them.
Packing up box after box after box of all the things Makenzie never used, never touched, never grew into, never care about... I know all that shit is just that--- shit. Its nice and some things are necessary but most are not. He could sleep in my dresser drawer and be just as happy.
11:57
visit bijou's blog to find out more about their vendors & to sign up for some amazing giveaways. i was lucky enough to win one last time. and let me tell you... best. giveaway. ever.
I have become a fan of Patrick Blanc since seeing his 260sq m creation on the outside of London's Athenaeum Hotel. In the heart of Mayfair and across the road from Green Park, Blanc installed ten thousand green plants of more than two hundred varieties to cascade down ten floors. In Paris one of his most outstanding vertical gardens can be seen at Quai Branley, the museum for indigenous art designed by Jean Nouvel. According to Blanc, vertical gardens can be hung in the tightest of spaces to provide an escape and a way to experience nature for those of us locked into urban living.
At first you don’t succeed. Try and try again!
My rating: 4/5 fishmuffins
65mph .....................Nearer My God To Thee
As the little boys in the playground realise their game has gone horribly, horribly wrong it will at least be some small comfort.
1 fibers
Finally there is the moral argument. To say that the intervention was a mistake opens me up to accusations that I am an apologist for Qadhafi, for dictators, for violence against civilians. I am not. Those accusers I would point back to the question of double standards, to situations past and present when Washington dismissed calls for intervention. Those who use the language of absolute morality in American politics are often relativists cloaking their specific interests and preferences in a mantle of righteousness – I look elsewhere for the sources of my moral vision. And I would point the accusers to the consequences. We have heard, with Iraq and with Libya, that interventions would be neat and straightforward. The aftermath of interventions has been anything but.
Teenagers, when given a neutral space LOVE talking to parents and often offer some of the best insight because they are going through it themselves. We have also be so excited to help parents who feel like they cannot reach their kids and teens.
Here's a little photo tour of our week at the parks:
2 cups of cream
Jessica is basically my inner voice. I am hers too, I hope. Although I’m more of a devilish influence on her.
In the meantime, I have posted a video about the materials I used to decorate the cover.
The Save Power Kit contains six items:
3. Solution.
On the first afternoon we walked the short route near the entrance gate. There we saw communal spiders and Satyrium orchids. Next morning we walked towards the Camel Koppie, but since I had to look at every different flower … we only got halfway.
A sinner, your Brother, God's forgotten love,
Dear PMS,
two different readings of 58,000 and 79,000.
Some of you have seen pictures, his name…so forgive me for resharing all of this, but it’s kind of nice to be able to post it all here so that I can look back years to come and relive this little stuff.
John wants you to know, add chip crumbles on top. It really makes it.
Today we commemorate two of the Twelve Apostles.
Of poesy, that it should be a friend
Like Columbo on a stake-out, Dog will be lying on his bed, pretending to sleep. But he’s not as clueless as he looks. Dog always has at least a half an eye open.
“IUPAC has been a great inspiration in my life and career,” Youngblood said. “I hope in the future to give back in a way that helps IUPAC to inspire another generation of scientists to work on scientific topics that can benefit Earth and humanity.”
You don’t have to give a monologue extolling her celestial brilliance but a concise compliment is okay. As long as you’re also engaging her in the conversation of some substance. Do: start a conversation. Ask question, listen then ask follow-up questions. This gives her the impression that you’re interested in actually getting to know what kind of person she is and not just what kind of panty she’s wearing. Unsure about what questions to ask. Take cues from your surroundings. Where are you guys? , what are you doing? Is she reading a book? Is she carrying some sort of boarding equipment or musical instruments. All these things will give you clues about her interest and hopefully help you spark a conversation.
In the silence between my sarcasm
Simple and Sweet.
Noel Fehily
CANADA, by the way, opens up like this: “First, I’ll tell about the robbery our parents committed. Then about the murders, which happened later. The robbery is the more important part, since it served to set my and my sister’s lives on the courses they eventually followed …” I don’t know about you, but that’s about the most noir opening to a novel I’ve read in many a long year.
Prologue: Hutta – Empire Start Planet – Level 1-10 (Imperial Agent / Bounty Hunter)
Warping the Beat, Not Your Records
The tech's name was Eddie and he was so nice when he came out to take us back to the room that I forgot all about complaining that we'd been sitting out there for an hour and a half. He asked me some questions, and I related once again the tale of the prematurity and oxygen need. Eddie then proceeded to tell me about the dozens of leads he was about to attach to Xander in a variety of places from head to toe.
This is the most common technique for field shoots in which speed and efficiency are important. A minimum of equipment is required and the production team can move around quickly and easily.
PS: As I was typing up my response and screencapping your stupidity, as I always do in these kinds of threads, I noticed something very interesting that I believe is worth bringing to people’s attentions if they didn’t catch it when, and if, they read your comment, “…the world was at the center of the earth.” I will give you the benefit of the doubt and assume it was a typo, but I think your parents may have dropped you one time too many.
I was so happy today to realise I had recieved my 200th Etsy sale! Yay! :D
New Belgium Brewing Company, makers of Fat Tire Amber Ale and a host of Belgian-inspired beers, began operations in a tiny Fort Collins basement in 1991. Today, the third largest craft brewer in the U.S., New Belgium produces eight year-round beers; Fat Tire Amber Ale, Ranger IPA, Sunshine Wheat, Blue Paddle Pilsner, 1554 Black Ale, Abbey, Mothership Wit and Trippel, as well as a host of seasonal releases. In addition to producing world-class beers, New Belgium takes pride in being a responsible corporate role model with progressive programs such as employee ownership, open book management and a commitment to environmental stewardship. For more information, visit www.newbelgium.com.
***Regular Litewraps are made with a very thick PUL that cracks and breaks down quickly, even with the utmost care. The aplix isn't very strong either.
Account No: 003120169026
Several chefs have opted out of Michelin's system in recent years, saying the personal and financial investment needed to maintain its standards didn’t pay off.
The B&B I had booked is run by an American who is into all things green and organic and on our arrival we were greeted like old friends with all embracing hugs and kisses.
Mirrlees didn’t publish another full-length book of poetry until 1976 - just two years before her death and written in a far more traditional, formal style - might be seen to point towards the seemingly anomalous nature of her Modernist experiment but equally begs questions about the hostile reception its publication was met with and the poem’s subsequent burial from any sort of
Lately, I’ve been watching old episodes of Sex and the City on E!. I’m a latecomer to SATC; my dad was way too cheap when I was younger to even consider paying for HBO. It wasn’t until I lived on my own that I developed a fondness for the show. Hell, I’ve even shelled out good money for the mediocre (at best) movies. But, I have a bone to pick. It’s been eating away at me for years, and it’s about time I said my piece.
More people in Africa's poorest countries have mobile phones than have bank accounts. That reality is spurring mobile service companies to explore how they can capture a share of the potential banking market by enabling migrants from these countries to transfer funds back home to their families.
We've had a run of head injuries lately. I've kind of lost count but I think we might be up to 8 in the last three weeks. I can't remember what caused them all but I can remember the locations of the bruises so working from that the tally sits at 3 for Dragon and 5 for Monkey... Lion has got off easily in this little competition!
Bianca Ryan – As a little girl, my favorite movie was The Rescuers, a cartoon adventure with mice. The heroine was a sophisticated girl mouse named Bianca.
Bill Gates? Big of him. Obama? Race to the Bottom begun with Jennifer Granholm (D-MI) and carried forward as you point out by Gov. Slick Rick Snyder (Gateway to China). Persecution of the public working force (read females) and the public resources. Education means nothing to this new group- they are defunding and taxing while they can get away with it despite outcries. Sheer Disgust by the people.
One thing about Judas, though-as regrettable as they may have been-Judas put actions to his belief, unlike Peter and the other disciples who were content to hide. So which disciple resonates with you? Is your faith something you wear with pride in the face of adversity? Is it something you would prefer to monitor in the lives of others? Is there any Judas in you?
All mothers worry about their children's futures. We worry about drugs and school and bullying. We worry about their health and self-esteem, their future careers and romantic lives.
I am stubborn like her. I am free and mindful like him. I am driven like him, and crafty like her. I love to read a good book, like her. I believe in second chances because of him; I believe in love because of her. I fight like her. I appreciate more because I didn't have him around. Of everything they gave me, didn't give me, I am like them. I am. At times, I wanted to be someone else. Someone prettier, richer, blonder. I wanted. I wanted more than I was given. I was greedy and ungrateful. Now, I want nothing more than what I have. A family, the friends that are worth having, knowledge some would kill for, and hope. Hope that things will happen how they are meant to.
If you find something that’s consuming your time more than anything else, you’ll have to reevaluate what’s really important in your life. Just as I mentioned to my friend yesterday, don’t be consumed by something that’s new and exciting. It’s a slippery slope. We’re humans. We try to do things well. What’s the point of doing something if we don’t buy the most, train the hardest, or prepare the longest? So why not dive into things head first, all gung ho?
I am sad and relieved at the same time. I’m depressed about having lost another job, and I’m scared about our lack of income. But I won’t miss working with the nutcases. I will miss working with the customers. So many of them depended on me to make sure that their samples were run and analyzed correctly. I had so much customer interaction – and that’s the stuff I am good at. Yes, I’m a scientist, but I’m a people-oriented scientist. That’s rare. Now how to market that?
Thor smiled before leaning in to kiss me. His lips were warm on mine; they were gentle. Time seemed endless, as if the world had stopped spinning. I sighed into the kiss, giving myself over to the dizzy sensation. Nothing had ever felt this right, and I had a feeling that nothing ever would.
Nike produces a wide array of sports gear and apparel. Among the first products were running and basketball shoes. Currently, they make jerseys for different sporting activities including track & field, baseball, football, tennis, lacrosse, soccer, golf and cricket. Recent additions to their line of products are Nike SB and Nike 6.0 footwear specially designed for skateboarding. Nike sells shoes for road running, soccer, basketball, athletics, American football, and cross training for men, women, and children. Nike also sells gear for outdoor sports such as tennis, baseball, golf, soccer, football, volleyball, bicycling, wrestling, aquatic games, cheer leading and multi-sport uses. They also hold Bauer brand athletic gear and Cole Haan dress and casual footwear brands.
*From Dan Gailey: -The University of Kansas School of Music and Hall Center for the Humanities are co-presenting pianist Randy Klein's Two Duos in concert on Saturday, February 11, at 7:30 p.m. in Swarthout Recital Hall. Admission is free. Klein is the 2011-12 Hall Center Simons Public Humanities Fellow and will be in residence at the University of Kansas for most of February. The February 11 concert will also feature trombonist Chris Washburne and saxophonist Ole Mathesin.
There’s a reason more than a dozen courts have looked at Davis’ case and refused to overturn his death sentence.
The reason I keep tweaking the offer is because I'm looking to the future. Pubs are going to have a hard time in the next couple of years. Taxation is going to be looked at, not like a cash cow (see the past government) but it's going to be tweaked, and there's only so much you can take before putting your prices up. In the next 6 months we've got the PBR, VAT increase, suppliers increase and the budget to look forward to. The pub of the future will be offering drinks that return a good GP - be it cash or % - and convey value for money at the same time. Mega brands, found everywhere, just won't cut it in 18 months time. Fast forward a few years, and I honestly don't think we'll be drinking pints any more.
He was gone for three days. Sucked out to sea in a tidal wave and spit back ashore at Coney Island with no memory of what happened. Now his dreams are haunted by a terrifying silver mermaid with razor-sharp teeth.
She would always give me some kind of signal..the one that pushed us over the edge... I remember like it was yesterday.
However the complete absence of the bloggers I know is not the only reason I haven't kept up with all local blogs that I know, There is one blogger I refuse to communicate with because of her criminally heartless treatment of one of my close friends. No names, no pack drill, as they say, and she is a lawyer so I'd probably get ripped a new arsehole if I linked to her after that comment.
Obviously a town on a river needs a number of river crossings, Clopton Bridge is one of several at Stratford crossing the Avon and dates from where the river was forded back in Saxon times and earlier. The first mention of a bridge dates from 1235, later writers considered this bridge a rather poor wooden one that was rather small and could be swamped by the river when waters were high.
About 10 years ago, if gamers spent fifty to sixty dollars on a game, they were about analytic at amid 5-10 hours of abandoned amateur gameplay. A triple-A appellation like The Fable of Zelda or Metal Gear Solid adeptness action an added 5-10 hours. The notable exceptions to the rule, RPGs, adeptness cap out at about 40-50 hours. Aback afresh there were aswell beneath studios absolution beneath amateur on beneath aloft systems, so there was potentially added time for gaming. You rarely heard the complaint that amateur were not continued abundant for their price.
But if anyone does come up with a formulation for Thick Skin In A Jar, please send me a sample. Express post.
we saw thrown from the hayloft door
In time you all will hardly remember me
I had saved some goodies I had won from Renea's My Glitter Coated Life Etsy.
· 3 whole eggs
Clay takes off again, shoots me a challenging look, and starts walking around the waiting area. Only this time, he adds the element of kicking his shoe off every few steps. I see his shoe flying through the air out of the corner of my eye as I wrestle Brooklyn into a chair and call to Clay, "That's one. That's two..."
From start to finish, I relied on her help to research the topic, organize my findings and present them in a clear, cogent manner. Ruth pored over drafts of each chapter, writing extensive notes and asking probing questions. She was a tough editor.
“OK I GET YOU!!” “I don’t have a docket… because… nobody came to my door… that I was sat directly behind… all day”
Firstly, forgiveness is not forgetting. The expression ‘forgive and forget’ causes many to say, ‘I can’t forgive because I can’t forget’. Forgiveness involves not going over past hurts in our minds, not keeping on telling other people about how we have been wronged in the past. Forgiveness is not forgetting, it is choosing not to remember, choosing not to go on reminding ourselves of past hurts.
Designs are available to be bought as a “print your own” card at a standard price of PhP 200. (See related items below).
Now I know that most people will take their children to these places since it is almost guaranteed that the child will eat.
Do ye hear the children weeping, O my brothers,
About a week ago, I began a course in “Advanced Sculptural Glass” at the Nova Scotia Centre for Craft and Design (NSCCD). While I’ve been making Glass Faery Ladies since the summer of 2006, and they are technically sculptural, that’s as advanced as I was able get in Soft Glass (sometimes referred to as soda-lime glass, with a C.O.E. of 104). Other beads artists experience in both soft-glass and borosilicate glass thought I was crazy to use glass that so easily thermal shocks, but I couldn’t help myself! Plus, I thought that my gear in my studios (a Nortel Minor Bench Burner running on a single 5 litre per minute oxygen concentrator) was not powerful enough to work with borosilicate (hard glass, with a C.O.E. of 33), but it turns out that I was mostly mistaken!
Highly disappointed? Noooooo. Oh please, no.
Ulla: This is a long posting, but it covers a lot of ground in terms of what we can do to actually step into the new reality we are co-creating with the Unseen Ones. It really helped me get a better sense of what is going on with me personally and with the world around us.
Bulgarka, whose Bulgarian harmony singing stems from a folk culture
“But when Jesus heard that he said unto them, They that be whole need not a physician, but they that are sick. But go ye and learn what that meaneth, I will have mercy, and not sacrifice; for I am not come to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance.”
Abaya Collection caters for each individual and the ethos is to provide something for every personality, but keeping things modest is the main aim. Materials range from chiffon, silk, georgette, linen, wool and a variety of mixed fabrics. Prices range from £15 - £150 and are depending on the fabric and the variety of work. Styles range from simple, butterfly, casual and individual made to measure orders can take up to four weeks. Ashia also takes orders for made to measure wedding Abaya's which she will soon be showcasing on her website very soon
My dad traveled to BC to meet with James the week before vacation to find out what was happening in his life & hear his testimony.
As usual, I remember little of the actual gig other than buying a terrible long sleeve T shirt with the Killjoy Was Here artwork on it, including luminous yellow dinosaur footprints up the arm. I do remember thinking that Bernard Butler was a shit-hot guitarist and that is something that has outlived the T shirt by some distance.
Of all the things I might have expected to encounter in an Ayahuasca vision, this seemed to be a real non sequitur. What in the world was this coin and why was Mother Ayahuasca showing it to me? I was at a complete loss. She seemed to understand my confusion, and she held the coin up for me to see. Like a camera close up, I instantly got a super close view of the face of the coin. It was a standard Peruvian “One Sole” coin, worth about thirty US cents. On its face, it read “Un Nuevo Sol.” Now that I had perceived this, the virtual camera switched me back to the wider shot of her holding the coin for me. Again, she widened those amazing eyes in inquiry, and now obvious merriment. I could almost hear her saying, “Do you get it yet?” I knew this was very important, and a smile played on my lips, too, but I still had no idea what to make of this small yellow coin.
I was reading this past Friday’s New York Times and found an interesting article, “Medicine for Obsesity Needs Study Panel Says.” The article cites the challenges that pharmaceutical companies have of getting obesity drugs, that do not cause heart attacks, approved by the FDA for market consumption.
Fulford’s sources seem very clear about who did this and why it was done. Nonetheless, this attack does not resemble any known terrestrial technology — regardless of how classified it may be.
Here’s the scenario: you’re a teleworker that lives in one state for an employer based in another. You work from home 3 days a week and commute across state lines to a company office for the remainder of the week. You may think you would pay income tax based on the state in which you reside or at least your wages would be split between the states based on the proportion of time spent in each (in this case, 60% to your home state and 40% to the state you commute to). Not so for states like New York that apply a “convenience of employer” rule. Under this rule, New York can tax nonresidents telecommuting part-time on all the wages they earn from the New York employer. In other words, you could be double taxed, paying taxes on 100% of your wages to New York and 60% of your wages to your home state. Other states, such as Pennsylvania, Nebraska, and Delaware have similar rules but New York is the only one so far that aggressively enforces it.
And her insides, coiled.
Honey Butter Chex Mix
The benefits of running are many, and my physical well-being has improved immensely since I started to run. But the most significant lesson I learned from running is that our biggest barrier to accomplishment is ourself. We limit ourselves with our fears and insecurities. We often think more in terms of what we can’t do instead of what we can do. I was never an athlete. Growing up, I had always been the intellectual one, not the athlete. But the experience of watching runners challenged me to wonder why I couldn’t be both. Imagine if we could apply that learning to bigger problems? Imagine if people who struggle with health challenges, depression and other co-morbidities could overcome the deep sense of defeat and find the strength to believe they can overcome — and more importantly, thrive. Physical challenges always remain, but the old saying of putting your mind to something holds true. We need courage to reach new heights.
Yet another of our pastors has planted a church in a village where years ago the first converts to Christ were killed. For their faith, not the lack of it.
Editorial Note: I know I've extremely over-simplified a lot of this, and I don't purport to be an expert in the history of blackface or playing Indian, so please, feel free to disagree or point to other resources in the comments!
‘Bishop’s Mill, Islington.’
I am an over-achiever. And for that, I do not achieve as an alternative to poor performance.
I must say that I always really enjoyed the director of this film, David Fincher. He made the good serial killer film "Zodiac" and then two years ago made one of the best films of the decade "The Social Network". "Seven" was one of his earliest films and you can really tell he is inspired by other serial killer films like "Silence of the Lambs" but in the end it doesn't matter. Along with "Silence of the Lambs", "Seven" is one of the best films of the 90's and one of the best serial killer films out there.
I rejoice as you, my eternal parents, celebrate
I belong to an organization of writers who are Christian. Each year hundreds of us enter work published during the previous twelve months, vying for awards in several categories, fiction and non-fiction books and articles. I started entering 3 years ago. The first year my work was shortlisted but didn’t place. The next year I placed first in personal experience and second in another category that slips my mind.
With the debt ceiling negotiations stuck in a circular loop, Wisconsin Republican Rep. Paul Ryan remains steadfastly opposed to the so-called ‘Gang of Six’ budget plan-despite the fact that it partly resembles his own budget proposal.
The logic of this argument seems to be that "personal" films correspond to biographical information.... This is why you see people refracting Polanski's entire career through his time hiding in the Warsaw ghetto and his exile to Europe, and why Soderbergh haters always claim he's making "cold," "technical" experiments. He didn't give them any meaningful biographical information! The jerk!
and two steps backwards
Zest from 2 lemons
If all of this weren’t bad enough, playwrights are frequently called upon to make individual donations to the theatres that produce their work, especially now that the economy has soured. Recently I received an impassioned plea from none other than Chicago Dramatists (full disclosure: I used to be a dues-paying member of their Playwrights’ Network) for “urgent” donations; that email got instantly deleted from my inbox. While many playwrights are happy to assist theatres in fundraising efforts (such as appearing at benefit parties, selling raffle tickets, etc), I don’t believe any playwright should be asked to donate his or her own money to keep a theater going. Playwrights are broke as it is, and there are plenty of other sources for donations beyond an arts organization’s own artists.
America has a very strange concept of what it means to value “family”. As someone who has a non-traditional family situation herself, I find it baffling that we are so unwilling to accept that single parents, same-sex parents, extended families, grandparent-headed families, etc, are just as valid as the traditional nuclear family.
1 pear - cored and chopped into chunks
Makes 3 Vegetarian
"During our conversation, he told me he actually regretted bringing Umno to Sabah, because its leaders only cared about themselves and not the party," said Jeffrey.
Free Comic Book Day is perfect for fans and newcomers alike – if you love the idea of comics, these are titles to give you a great taste of what’s waiting for you. You can join the comics revolution – discover comics for the first time or return to the fold to see what you’ve been missing.
If you have ever been in a courtroom you may have seen a court reporter at work without knowing exactly what they were doing. The basic job function is to record every word that is spoken in the courtroom so that the record, or transcript, of the proceedings can be used later. A transcript can range from just a few pages to a lengthy record the length of a novel. Of course, the transcript must be completely accurate and sometimes reporters must ask people to repeat things, perhaps if they speak too quickly, mumble, or have a foreign accent.
At the risk of repeating a refrain very familiar to this blog, it's actually the B-side I prefer. "Hello Again" starts off sounding exactly like the work of a freakbeat outfit before establishing its easy credentials - but again, the speed, vim and vigour of the thing shouldn't be underestimated. If placed mid-way through a standard mod DJ set, nobody would flinch (much).
Happy Sunday, everyone! Y'all having a good weekend? I had a lovely Saturday -- I worked on getting some things together, listened to the Met Opera's NPR broadcast of "Siegfried" (after seeing the HD broadcast last year, I have a heightened appreciation for Wagner and especially tenor Jay Hunter Morris), briefly visited with a dear college friend who was in town for a journalism conference, and watched an awesome movie via Netflix called "Cracks." (Eva Green ... holy crap. I've always liked her, but this movie has converted me to full-on stan.)
Aktwali, blood nya.
The official line in Norway that comes from the top down is that none of what Breivik says is true, so the only official diagnosis can be is that he is a paranoid schizophrenic living in his own delusional world. This conflicts with all of the evidence presented to a sane mind though.
2 ½ cups bottled clam juice
But happy still does seem;
I would publicly like to thank those who entrusted me with thier vote at the recent elections in Eastleigh on 3rd May.
HAPPY BIRTHDAY LITTLE PRINCESS.. :D
Only three more streets and I’ll be home.
Don’t paint the inside of your home based on what your favorite colors are. Remember that you’re selling your home and its new owners might not like those colors. It is wiser to go with neutral colors, like eggshell or taupe. Put a high value on the need for new paint, as it will reflect a feeling of freshness that many buyers will look upon favorably.
Control.
Rnd 2) ch1, 2hdc in each st around (22)
phase where I managed to work out the issues and accept my new life.
Metro editors and reporters have followed the investigative pattern. The first question we now ask when a violent crime comes over the scanner is "Likely or not likely?" And the office of the Deputy Commissioner for Public Information, the NYPD flak, responds in kind.
One ditch is crossed by a narrow footbridge into a hide looking over a lake – if a dried up muddy hollow can be described as a lake. Other visitors have noted their observations in the visitors’ book – one entry for July records the presence of avocets, oystercatchers, reed buntings, little ringed plovers, lapwings, sedge warblers and a variety of other birdlife but also notes ‘almost no water for feeding!’. Disappointingly, like some more recent visitors to the hide, I’m unable to spot anything, not even the deer that were recorded a few days earlier (although the presence of high fences in the distance makes me wonder if these were farmed and not wild visitors at all).
And because of this, one will inevitably run into people (the high-and-mighty traveler; I’ll write about them later) who shun these places because they are so “touristy” and not “off the beaten path”. But the truth is, the reason why those places are so frequented is because they are the most interesting/fun/historical places to go. In my opinion, anyone who tells you otherwise is either full of shit or has their nose so high up in the air that all they see is the sky. Yes, it’s fun to get away from the touristy areas for a while, but overall for me, I like talking to people who speak English, I like partying with other travelers, and I like hanging out with people who have something in common with me.
Flavor is more of the same, a little bread and caramel with an herbal dryness from the hops. Carbonation is a lot better in this batch compared to my first. Mouth feel is moderate and crisp. Just enough bitterness to balance everything out and make it very drinkable.
Should every member of Christ true church be saying, “I don’t care what the Brethren say, I will take the Holy Spirit as my guide and not be deceived.” Or maybe, “I will prove all things that any man or group of men say by the Spirit of God.”
The bulk Pokémon amateur accept never looked better.
This weekend's jaunt was announced after first lady Michelle Obama said during a recent trip to Panama City Beach, Florida that, "One of the best ways that fellow Americans can help is to come on down here and spend some money," She's expected to be joined by the president and 9-year old Sasha. Malia, 12, is away at camp for the first time at an undisclosed location.
Yesterday April 30 was a very bad day for me. I barely got anything done, I was stressing out about a lot of things. It was just a big mess. I am quite familiar with strange topics and different religions. It had totally slipped passed me that April 30th is the beginning of Beltaine a two day festival also known as May Day. A big day for the occult. Hitler killed him self at 3:30 pm on April 30th because of his occultist beliefs. May Day a.k.a. Beltaine is a fertility festival that often involves human sacrifice. Witches and other occultist are practicing heavily on this day and a lot of bad energy and demons are flying around like crazy. I follow L. A. Marzulli’s wordpress blog and he realized it and posted up a blog asking people to pray and clothe themselves with the full Armor of God. It is one of my favorite post of his. He is right and I was totally amazed by the stuff I learned and hearing a very awesome spiritual story he had to share. I sent the link out and asked some people to read it. I commented several times on his blog. I would encourage everyone to read this blog. Here is the link:
For weeks, months, years now, former Spice Girl Victoria Beckham seems to have made it her personal mission in life not to smile in public.
The book’s dedication reads: “For sons, and for their fathers.” I’m not saying that daughters and mothers won’t enjoy the book but the mother-daughter dynamic is different to the father-son dynamic. Andrew didn’t ask me to review this book; I offered. He’s from Grangemouth on the east coast and the only thing that connects us is the Forth and Clyde Canal – literally.
La Isla Bonita
Although this sponsorship has enabled the Conservatorium to provide a team of specialist tutors to work with the BSYO students on a weekly basis, and provide hundreds of scholarships to assist the development of these players, the money is in no way connected with one of the orchestra’s raisons d’etre – their much-anticipated tours. It must therefore be acknowledged here that these tours could not go ahead without the support of the dedicated staff, students and their parents. The fundraising effort alone requires an extra level of commitment, on top of the additional rehearsal time not to mention the logistics that go into preparing the orchestra for a tour.
Anyway. The most amazing part of my Saturday was that I actually went to bed before 10. It was glorious. I woke up Sunday morning feeling so refreshed and ready to take on the world. I ended up making it to church where Caleb promptly fell asleep and I prayed that my hungry stomach wouldn't grumble so loud that I woke him and that the entire congregation wouldn't hear me.
Why has it not really happened yet, at least on a large scale? Because we haven't had the people to do it. Much of the history of modern pagan/heathenism has been one of solitary practitioners, small covens or groups, the former of which could be anywhere and the latter of which generally could only be found in larger cities until more recent times, where increased numbers and lowered fears.
** Will add a video-tutorial later,(without the use of corn syrup). In the mean time for those of you who cannot wait here is the link from wherein I got my inspiration.
TV provided fashion role models like Cathy McGowan, famous for her mod outfits, who presented the weekly chart hit show ‘Ready Steady Go.’ ‘The Avengers’ was notable for the sexy clothing worn by Diana Rigg’s character Emma Peel. ‘Nova’, ‘Honey’ and ‘Petticoat’ magazines were created to appeal to teenage girls interested in clothes, while the ‘Sunday Times’ published the first weekend colour supplement with articles on lifestyle and interior decoration.
Only kidding. However...
“Being able to tap this vast amount of oil locked within this formation will go a long way to help to meet our future demands for oil. The U.S. Geological Survey, as you noted, estimates that the formation contains about 3 trillion barrels of oil of which half may be recoverable,” she said.
I made up this fun floral pattern, using the same colors I painted the colorful kitchen chairs!
Although the market for budget tablets is getting increasingly crowded, the Acer Iconia Tab A200 offers a lot for its relatively low price.
The lawn can be described in one syllable - peh.
“Which of your books do you like the least?”
French politicians are banned from receiving campaign contributions from foreign states, and a French judge is currently looking into the allegations.
Obviously these two are loving their lives... :)
In a mystery, the secondary characters are almost as important as your detective protagonist, because they will mostly fall into two groups – the criminal(s) and the “information passers”. Each of these characters has one of the pieces of the plate in their possession; for reasons of their own, usually because they are implicated in the crime, they are sometimes reluctant to surrender it. Others may be too willing to give up their piece, their information, but they are suspect, too. Not only must your detective gather these pieces, the clues, but also perceive why and how these people who surrender them to him are connected to the crime, and how valuable their information really is.
The full UFC 137 card includes:
Unfortunately, this narrative doesn’t comport with reality. The Altmire-Critz race, wrote Caitlin Huey-Burns at RealClear Politics, was between “two conservative Democrats” forced “into a member vs. member primary.” While Democrats vote out center-left representatives like Altmire and Holden, the GOP goes after staunch conservatives like Utah’s Orrin Hatch, who rated 100 percent on the ideological scorecards of the Chamber of Commerce and the American Conservative Union in 2010. There is room on the liberal spectrum to the left of Altmire and Holden, but it’s hard to get farther to the right than Orrin Hatch. The positions taken by the ousted Democrats — Altmire supported a balanced-budget amendment — were conservative by any measure; neither Altmire nor Holden was a liberal counterpart to Hatch. It’s one thing for a right-winger to face a primary challenge from an even more extreme right-winger. It’s quite another for an actual centrist to be challenged by someone incrementally further to the left. Pennsylvania’s Democrats were deposed not because they declined to become card-carrying Communists but because they declined to support a version of health care reform originally proposed by the conservative Heritage Foundation!
And he screams
Another very famous socially responsible entrepreneur is Blake Mycoskie who when traveling in South America met children who did not own shoes. He started the company TOMS, a shoe company that for every pair of shoes you buy it donates a pair of shoes to a child in need. He has also expanded the program to eyeglasses.
As for her role in the incident that was captured on the school bus surveillance system, Williams said it was an accident.
Cincinnati, OH – June 3, 2009 – At a time when many publications are shrinking or ceasing operations altogether, Cincinnati public relations firm Eisen Marketing Group has launched a new industry trade publication The Clubhouse. The magazine is the official publication of the Public Relations Agency Owners Association (PRAOA) and focuses on addressing the unique needs and challenges faced by agency owners.
‘We’re waiting for,’ Petro began, scanning the sky above them, then spotting a tiny grey dot that became a tiny grey line that became a large grey line that became a massively long, dusty silver coloured rope that Petro grabbed a hold of, ‘this!’ He showed it to the lady.
Rules the writhings which make manifest
■Farmer’s Neighbor #1
Sadly, she has just transferred universities this semester. So I guess that ends our 'seeing each other everyday' thing. It's so lonely at school now since my boyfriend and I broke up, I have no one else that I am close with in school. *tear I just can't have the same relationship with people I meet in my classes. They are great and all, but I just want to see them in class. I have no interest in outside communication. LOL? Does that sound mean? Or you get what I mean...... Ha-ha!
Please check for the buyer reviews of Samsung, Mitsubishi DLP TV compatible 3D kit Emitter and FOUR pair rechargeable glasses –works with all Samsung original and 3rd party Infrared synced wireless LCD shutter glasses including Mitsubishi and Samsung 3D Starter Kits from the merchant’s site by visit the link below.
I’m pleased to announce that we are now working on sharing character journals for the ongoing Pathfinder campaign: Let Sleeping Tsars Lie! You’ll find a new entry on the menu now, which you can follow to Meryk’s Journal and Emma’s Diary–the first two of a growing collection of character perspectives. It is our hope that you enjoy reading along with our adventures and experiences–and that the journals provide another angle and perspective into the campaign as it unfolds from the Price of Immortality trilogy to and through the Slumbering Tsar Saga!
Ladies Choice by Kid Is Qual
and is editor of the Insight Journal)
Tomato – 5
**If you scroll through the pics in this post, you'll see several that are slightly discolored. This post took forever to write because most of the pictures were loading like this & most weren't at all usable. Does anyone have any advice on how to correct this? I really appreciate it! And I really apologize for using the ones that do have discolorations, but I had to give in before I went crazy**
In March, the court ruled that it was not constitutional to oblige people from a wide range of professions, including clergy, journalists, NGO activists and others, to swear that they had not collaborated with the secret police during the Communist period and afterwards.
Total page count: 418
Maybe when you have a lot of linking for divine persons it is called bhakti and when you have a lot of liking for movie/cricket/rock stars it is called fan feeling and when you have a lot of liking for a person or animal you know – it is called love!
Oops. Anxious, much?
You know something? It feels great to say that!
The Austin Statesman's Dave Harmon has one of the better articles I've seen ("Undocumented immigrants in jail: Who gets deported?," March 18) detailing how the federal "Secure Communities" program - which IDs undocumented immigrants in jail for deportation - actually operates on the ground in Travis County. Harmon found that about 10% of Travis County inmates who've received ICE detainers were jailed for Class C misdemeanors, though that practice is receding, and that most of those deported were arrested for misdemeanors. Among the story's highlights:
The textures and flavors in this little corn tortilla were dreamy. Crunchy cabbage, smooth and citrus-y guacamole, flaky tilapia with spicy heat in every bite, and pico de gallo bursting with sweet tomato flavor, bright lime, and earthy cilantro.
To get it ready in time it needs to be lowish gravity, so I'll aim at something like 1.040 and use a fast acting, flocculant yeast, like S-04.
It's 5am in Texas, otherwise I'd be calling Kit right about NOW. Damn this time difference.
Tomorrow: Sew these pieces together and start construction of the basic coat.
"Yeah but you and I are talking later. Good luck with Ted and try not to jump on him."
March 1966 - Dr Michael Ramsey, the new Archbishop of Canterbury, made an official visit to the Pope in the Vatican.
I'm turning 40 in five months. I'll be honest with you and say I'm a little weirded out by this one. I'm THAT person who just loves birthdays. But this one is taking some getting used to...although I just heard 40 is the new 30.
My self induced torture (and let’s kid no one here – when you have to start your exercise at 9:00 at night because of Soccer and Gymnastics schedules – working out at that hour really stinks) has brought an unexpected benefit.
Nyx Lipgloss in Whipped and Natural Collection Lipstick in Rose Petal
Valley of the Mind's Eye
3 Tablespoons Chopped Fresh Cilantro – divided
ACCORDING to the most recent figures produced by the British Beer & Pub Association, in 1997 total UK beer sales in pubs and bars were 25.6 million bulk barrels. In 2010 the figure had fallen to 14.2 million, a decline of over 44%. There hasn’t been a single quarter since 1997 when on-trade beer sales have shown a year-on-year rise. The biggest single year-on-year fall was 10.6% between the second quarters of 2007 and 2008, the first full year of the smoking ban. The average annual decline over the 13-year period was 4.4%. Over the past three years, that has accelerated to 7.3%.
Who avoid vain talk;
I know I may not be explaining very well the thought processes running through my mind...but that is about as close as I can come to them.
Unlike most people, Steve never had a problem with biting off more thane could chew.
Oftentimes the story takes a new direction, which I'll allow to play out, even if it derails the structure I set up. Some writers are adamant about sticking to the outline, and for good reason. If you drift off too far, you may have a hard time weaving in various plotlines so that they come together at the end. And in a way that doesn't seem forced.
AL East:
Chavrie Goat Cheese
I'm keen to read War Picture Library 207 Be Tough, Be Cunning. In that respect the cover has already sold me on the story. And isn't that what it's supposed to do?
Dave’s Gourmet is an award-winning line of delicious pasta sauces. Many of them are organic and each one of them packs a punch when it comes to flavor. I love that the variety ranges from the classic marinara red sauce to fantastically unique varieties like the Butternut Squash sauce. The biggest surprise came in the form of the Masala Marinara which hit me with a good tang and a subtle sweetness. In addition to tasting incredibly good, the sauces are thick and hearty. There is no runny liquid that collects on your plate and the sauces are stick to your bones scrumptious.
Top with the other tortilla, butter side up. Let cook a couple of minutes on each side. The butter and brown sugar creates a crispy, yummy outside with a melty inside. However, crispy, yummy goodness turns into burnt sugar yuckiness very quickly, so watch it closely. Also, wipe out the pan between each one, so the sugar left from the previous one doesn't burn the next one you make.
No words could have been more profound or meaningful.
3) Re: publicity and marketing: I shall save those ideas for tomorrow, as I just REALLY wanted EVERYONE to know that REAL AGENTS DO NOT COST MONEY UP FRONT (or at all, until there are earnings to be had).
Ooh, that sounds fancier than it is.
few dashes soy sauce
Well I'm not so sure.
I no longer knowingly drink (or eat) anything that uses an artificial sweetener.
Following are excerpts from an interview with Dr. Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Al-Jazeera TV on June 5, 2006.
- If you disable your profile view, please do the same as item #3. I won't be able to email you or find out where you are if I can't view anything.
Waitress:'yes its decaff'
Reverse the party polarity, jump ahead four decades to today, and that is the current sad state of American reality. Gangsters rule the federal government; the Operation Fast And Furious congressional investigators are ineffectual, toothless buffoons, and their spineless congressional leaders even balk at further investigation of the deadly scandal.
Pokok Sena Umno division secretary Ramli Idrus said the amount was too much to believe given the fact that the deal inked in 2002 was for US$1 billion.
President David O. McKay said, “Honesty and sincerity are the basic virtues of a noble character. Honesty… is the first virtue mentioned in the 13th Article of Faith. It is founded on the first principles of human society and is the foundation principle of moral manhood. It is impossible to associate manhood with dishonesty. To be just with one’s self and to others, one must be honest with himself and with others. This means honesty in speech as well as in actions. It means to avoid telling half truths as well as untruths.”
Now I know, both from the dictionary definitions, and from talking to people over the years, that many abhor the idea that athletes are often “cocky”, “conceited”, or “self-absorbed”. That for every person that loved Deion Sander’s moniker of “Prime Time”, there were those that couldn’t stand him. That for every fan of the Los Angeles Lakers’ “Showtime”, there were those that preferred the “blue collar” Boston Celtics.
The first part of May – warmer weather – yeah! Teddy is very happy that spring is back and bringing even warmer than normal temperatures – hopefully! March was a gift but April was a bit disappointing weather wise Teddy thought. : ( The phone is ringing at TLC Construction as home owners decide it is time to remodel, update or more! They have been spring cleaning and moving things around in their home. Now they don’t have enough space! One problem some customers in Northern Illinois have is room to do everything in their home that they need to do. Our weather is not always conducive to being outside; families grow and change; and many of us have lots of technology and hobbies to find places to house. Teddy and TLC help customers find answers to these and many more questions.
In fact, she said, many families in which both spouses work are in lower income brackets.
What's not to love about a cartoon cat? Her pottie habits are not nice. She sheds all over the place and can no longer be put into a cat carrier to go to the vet. Luckily the vet will come if I need her. But when I see that chubby sweet face with the pink nose, I'm still all mushy in love!
Hoagie- I refer to sandwiches from places like Subway as hoagies, always have, always will, in Florida they are called Hero's or Subs, wtf ever dude, just gimme my meatball and cheese please..
Next I begin to add the darker colors in the leaves and the fruit. If you've ever seen strawberries in the fields you would notice that the smaller fruits were really green and even the larger ones aren't fully red. It's not until later on that they turn that beautiful deep red that we associate
Bottom line is it’s gentle for even the most sensitive skin, but I’m gonna keep looking for a natural alternative that won’t burn my skin.
While Dr. Yamaguchi was being treated for his wound, he reportedly attacked one of the nurses, attempting to bite into her flesh as well. The nurse escaped harm and locked Dr. Yamaguchi in the room where he was being treated. The report also stated that Dr. Yamaguchi was very forcefully attempting to get out of the room he had been locked in. Eventually he was freed by another patient who had been infected.
On April 20, 2010, BP’s Deepwater Horizon oilrig exploded, and began the release of at least 4.9 million barrels of oil. BP then used at least 1.9 million gallons of toxic Corexit dispersants to sink the oil.
Some very different takes on a common problem this week. I'm sure I missed a lot of pieces to these haikus that I hope you will all share. My stylistic poetry and one-dimensional essays about poetry will hopefully prevent me from winning/judging in the future.
And if you don't mind, please add this button to your blog so others can join in the fun, too!
A very hard way to learn a lesson.
I have discovered I have a central theme to my life: children. And I have fluttered about with many things having to do with children: having them, home schooling them, coaching them, adopting them, advocating for them. You name it...and I have probably done it when it comes to children. And in my mind...I am constantly looking for that next beautiful flower to land on.
RR—Since my book came out, I have been contacted by about half a dozen Native Americans and one Native Canadian. One was a Choctaw Indian from Mississippi and he basically said to the effect that, “We know about these lights, we know about these big hairy creatures. We’ve thought about these things for thousands of years, and the white man is just beginning to recognize that this is real.
1 overflowing
White and Silver glitter card. Using a Sugar Nellie stamp,
I planted my cool weather lettuce, chervil and onions. I cut back a field of weeds (saved the pictured pokeweed because I love it). Although we still have until the 21st to officially say good bye and there's still like 2 months of great grilling weather, I can't help but feel how far spring is: I have blizzard dread. I fear that day in January when I'm utterly sick of eating root vegetables and I hate my rabbit hat.
My friends and I listened to all the popular rockers. My first concerts included Aerosmith and the Stones. We all had our favorite Party Music and later, our favorite Cruising Music, enjoyed on tape by the lucky few with an eight-track or cassette deck in their car.
A new study shows that the majority of Americans do not trust the leftist propagandists of the MSM, that is good news, but there is still work to be done to finally and permanently wrench the narrative from the liars, looters and destroyers, which is why you should do what you can to support Conservative bloggers. For this particular blog, in addition to the tip jar, you can also help by buying ad space, shopping through my Amazon stores and links or getting some nifty anti-Obama merchandise at my CafePress store. Remember, lots of Conservative bloggers have Amazon affiliate accounts, so you can shop through your favorite bloggers' links for things you'd be getting anyway and your favorite bloggers get a small commission without costing you anything extra!
I don’t know if it’s something in the holy water or what, but it seems to me that the Christians around me are going through some serious marital issues. My college roommate’s fiancé cheated on her. That was over 10 years ago. In the decade since then, I’ve not had any close friends go through really rocky times in their relationships. And then, in the last three months, I’ve had four friends, two close, two not so close, whose husbands have been unfaithful and have told them that they 1) don’t love them, 2) haven’t loved them in a quite some time, 3) doesn’t even like them, 4) it’s all their (the wives) fault, 5) they want to stay together for the kids.
· Keep up-to-date on design and product trends in order to contribute products ideas to include in the monthly kit and ideas of how to generate more sales.
We believe one of the main drivers of the healthy demand for industrial property has been Singapore’s robust factory output growth. While it has tapered off from the strong pace last year, industrial production is still growing at an impressive rate, rising 22 per cent from a year ago in March.
Anyone hear of the stereotype of the Philippine’s? They like the medical field. Is that true to probably the best boxer in the world? Manny Pacquiao ( Filipino).
How to survive a trip home late at night:
-Just how much television DO you watch?
Here's my card!
Second Mountain, not far west of Hawk Mountain, has counted on 3 days of the new season so far, finding 7 birds, 3 of them Red-tailed Hawks. The other sites have all reported counts on just one day so far. Four sites reported for August 10, making it the best day of the season, both for the number of sites covered and the number of raptors seen. A total of 26 raptors were counted, of which 9 were kestrels, 6 broadwings and 4 bald eagles (all at Waggoner’s Gap).
In all the anticipation before the play date I have been cleaning like crazy so that 1) I can regain some sanity, because I abhor living in a clutter pit, and 2) our newish friends don't think we're total slobs. Spurred on by my desire to live in a clean house, the impending play date, and my attempt to break the cleaning down into smaller projects, I have made a beginning of my own, which will be my first to share with you.
In fact my blog is damn useless: A list of complaints about toast and coffee with the occasional sex adventure of Bruce in Orchard Towers or Bangkok. Boring, right? Specialised topics, right?
Luckily I wasn't near a computer while I composed a barbed little post in my head in response to this person. Because, you know what, it really bothers me when somebody listens to the birth story that a woman shares and mocks it.
When I first read the tutorial, I was a little confused about how it would all come together since it has you sewing through the top layer, the batting, and the bottom layer all at once while piecing the strips of fabric together, but when you start in the middle and keep matching right side to right side and sewing up the edge closest to the end of the runner you are working toward it turns to be quite easy.
If your dress is a little complicated to get into or if the bustle is difficult to put together you may want to think about hiring someone from the salon where you bought your wedding dress to help you get dressed. They would stay to get you dressed and leave after the ceremony, once your train is bustled.
2. Cook broccoli until heated through (if frozen, 3 minutes in the microwave worked for me)
Lastly, the LINK GAME:
For capital gains, presently taxed at a 15% rate, the gains rate would rise an additional 3.8 percentage points for high-income taxpayers, those with adjusted gross incomes (AGI) above $250,000 ($200,000 if filing a “single” return). Capital gains arise with the sale of capital assets, such as stocks, bonds, and real estate.
being able to redo the cushions at some point.
So the rules. I’ll follow them mostly, only—to be honest—I don’t regularly follow 15 blogs, so I’m going to award just a few VBA’s for now. As my reading expands (if it expands), I’ll add to that list. O, first I’m to share seven things about myself.
The Pacquiao film, probably the most beautiful one of the lot, was shot in Manila, featuring the fighter going through his regular pre-fight ritual, interspersed with shots of his fans crowding around televisions to cheer him on as he enters the ring. What's his White Rabbit? Fighting the fight that really matters.
Next up: my new work ID. I walk around like this? Can you even tell that I'm in the picture or do I blend in completely with the background? Geez. I'm a ghost! Anddddd I look like I just rolled out of bed. I get to wear this around at work ALL THE TIME. And it's the picture that comes up when anyone in the company searches for me. I'm so glad people get to think I really look like that. At least my hair looks kinda good? Must get new picture ASAP!
If then you were raised with Christ, seek those things which are above, where Christ is, sitting at the right hand of God. Set your mind on things above, not on things on the earth. For you died, and your life is hidden with Christ in God. (Col 3:1-3 NKJ)
3- New Image Stamps (From The Winter Release (They Coordinate with the New Vintage
There was an old saying..I believe it came from Ben Franklin – that one person’s rights ended at the next man’s nose. Sadly, a lot of people seem to have forgotten that, with the result that everyone’s miserable.
The second woman in Alex's life is Ivona, a plain Polish woman whom he met when she simply made up the numbers on an evening out with friends at college. With a 'docile and long-suffering manner' she gives 'the impression of a natural born victim' something that makes Alex feel both sorry for her and hugely irritated by her. But she seems devoted to him, something very different to 'the usual back-and-forth, the game of trying to seduce a woman.'
Troubleshooting an application crash is one of the most frustrating tasks for the everyday geek, but now Soluto has upgraded their already-awesome boot-speed-up application with an application crash analyzer—and it helps disable browser add-ons too.
He gets right on that, apparently, because in the very next scene she’s sitting for the painter, holding a goat in her lap. It looks like she’s posing for this portrait, which was done by Raphael. Lucrezia wanders in and comments that Giulia’s beautiful, much more beautiful than the artist has made her. Guilia introduces herself to Lucrezia, and Lucrezia starts peppering her with questions, asking why she’s being painted and whether Lucrezia will be painted too. Giula promises to see that Lucrezia gets a portrait of her own. Getting in good with the daughter—clever move, Giulia. Lucrezia asks about the goat and the painter tells her it’ll become a unicorn. Lucrezia decides she wants a seahorse in her own painting. Giulia points to the necklace she’s wearing, which has a seahorse pendant, and she gives it to Lucrezia as a gift. And with that, they’re BFFs.
I know they are going to get used, and I know that my project was
Sierra Nevada Torpedo 6
Do your children own anything?
Warrants were issued for Leeann M. Applegate, 20, with addresses in Lakewood, Jackson and Jersey City. She is associated with co-defendants Robert Ferguson, 21, of Jackson, and Christopher Kiraly, 23, with a last known address in Jackson, police said.
and that is my vent for the day...thanks for listening blogger world.
One thing that is good is that I am starting to remember a lot of what I used to do in nursing
Jun 14 St. Petersburg, Russia (Review by Pro_Ice)
At an estimated 250 men, the LRA isn’t a large force, but they’re consistently on the move. They cross countries’ borders like John Mayer crosses starlets off his “To Do” list. A military operation to capture Kony will require the consent of at least three countries. If you think this deserves a high-level meeting at the United Nations, fix yourself a hot toddy and go to bed. If you’re pretty sure everyone will agree with whatever you decide, continue on!
14 cake mixes
However, I will eat the fruit as such, but it is a task to get my husband have them. So I blend them in juices and get him to drink those.
Anyway, I've realised I've hit a little bit of a problem with my self-promotion (okay, I've also hit the big problem of being naff at it, but that's a different blog post) for 'Heaven Can Wait'. I've billed the book as YA fantasy - which it is, at least in the sense that it's about being a young man in love, and it's got ghosts and magic and monsters in it - but while I have read a fair amount of YA fantasy, my bookshelves are mainly laden with high and epic fantasy, and some sci-fi, little if any of which could reasonably be described as YA.
Occasionally and somewhat uncharacteristically, I can be incredibly audacious as I was when I wrote to Stephen C. Bird in a bid to inveigle him into sending me a copy of his book. Luckily, Stephen obliged and despatched a copy of “Hideous Exuberance” with eleemosynary abandon. I threw myself into it shortly after finishing “Tropic of Cancer” and was very glad of the change in verisimilitude. “Hideous Exuberance” begins with a character perlustration of one Ginger Bocey a “blue-black haired, blue eyed, pale faced” hoyden on the prowl in the town of Smellicottville, somewhere in upstate New York. Ginger, “no society lady”, is known locally for her soiled pants, a tongue as powerful as that of a dragon, and being defiled by “Conniver McGillicuddy in an old VW van”. Ginger is “a no good” who’s succumbed to depravity after her “polygamous and polytheistic” daddy had his wicked way with her for straying “too far from the path of the Lord”. Now, she thinks “bad mens are hot” and goes around town spreading her legs and her “white trash sexual sophistication” on pool tables and gas station bathrooms with the legerdemain of a Soviet gymnast. Among her string of redneck cavaliers is a priest, Father Elizabeth Branigan, who instead of preoccupying himself with hermeneutics and the like partakes in orgies, wears David Bowie make-up and has his phizog semi-permanently ensconced in Ginger’s gash. The good priest tells Ginger: “There’s a future for you in German shit-porn, you sassy brassy lady,” before running off to a bake sale in St Angela’s parish, while Ginger dreams of “defecation parfait,” and “shitfruit pie”.
In my mind’s eye, I see an African mother. She is an amalgam, really….her face a compilation for every young sub-Saharan woman whose picture I have ever seen on the glossy pages of National Geographic magazine.
You see, it's the myth of the cocktail, rather than the sum of its alcoholic parts, that's so incredibly potent: More than an amusing way to drink alcohol, a well-made cocktail is a sign that you recognise the possibility of a more sophisticated, less frantic world - at least until you slide inelegantly off your bar-stool having forgotten Dorothy Parker's maxim: 'I like to have a martini,/Two at the very most/Three and I'm under the table/Four and I'm under the host.'
3. Place a sheet of baking paper on a baking tray and spray it with non-stick spray. Drop tablespoons of dough on the tray keeping about 3 cm (1 inch) between each. You should get about 16-18 out of one recipe. To make eclairs, place the dough into a piping bag with a round tip (about a 1 cm opening) and pipe 8 cm (3 inch) strips onto the sheet about 6 cm (2 inches) apart.
These phones are offered in four different conditions. Refurbished means pristine condition with manual and box. Excellent shows very little sign of use. Good has normal wear and tear. Fair shows a lot of wear. What you choose depends on whether this phone is a replacement or second phone for your existing plan, a phone to take overseas on travel, or perhaps just something you want to give the kids without having to pay a lot and without worrying too much if it gets broken.
From Sirius A to Sirius B matter –zatter- consciousness flow
We left Lake Titicaca and headed to Arequipa, Peru, although we nearly lost our lives on the way there. Stupidly we took the ‘local’ bus, which turned out to be the fishmongers and sales bus. As the workers opened up the bottom of the bus to store our luggage the stench of fish that came out nearly made me sick. Then we had to endure 6 hours of salesmen nattering away in Spanish trying to sell the next moisturizer that will rid you of those annoying wrinkles. No thank you Senor! To top it off, the driver thought he was part of Formula 1 and we nearly had a head on collision with a truck since all of the drivers love to overtake going at top speeds, around bends, with steep cliffs on the side of the road. Fortunately everyone stopped when this truck decided to overtake on a bend and no one went over the edge, however our nerves were tested to the max. As you can imagine we were relieved when we arrived in Arequipa with all limbs attached. We spent four days in the white city calming our nerves, relaxing in the garden of our hotel, eating some delicious food (Alpaca!) and drinking some good coffee! We even found Starbucks! So we have decided that we are now flashpackers! We are travellers that would not dream of doing dorms, we now travel in luxury busses, we eat good food (well when we can) and when we camp we have room service! We saw the flashpacking phrase in a brochure talking about the hotel we were staying at and it kind of stuck…well for Peru anyway.
We found Ninja one day in our house because we had left the window open for Bob and there she was without a collar just sat on our table she was quite big so my mum said we can’t feed her because then she will think it is her home so we just left her happy as Larry just sat on the table. After that she just kept coming into our house so we started putting out lost and found posters up around were we live and waited for a response when no response came we caught her and took her to the vets to see if she had a chip and she didn’t so we took her home
On top of figures recently showing that the only growing part of the economy - manufacturing - was itself turning down, the truth about the Liberal-Tory economic policy is seen today with the announcement of the Focus DIY chain that it is going into administration.
Chapter 7 of Daniel occurs in Belshazzar’s first year of reign about 550 B.C.
MISGUND: Unconfirmed report of an attack on a smallholding.
½ lb shredded mozzarella cheese
*The only kids who need to spell are writers and kids in a spelling bee.
The sceptic would say, “That does not work.” How does the sceptic know; has he tried it? Of course not, for he has neither faith nor trust. This is true with most professing Christians today, for their faith is more in the world than the Lord.
Summary: Today we have an exercise in future history (see Wikipedia), a look at my forecast of medium-term geopolitical trends. The most interesting predictions are at the end (starting with #4), our responses to the obvious trends.
Stars punched with my Big red star punch don't know the name of it :(
When it is colored to your satisfaction, mound it up into a small pile and swipe it around to pick up the last of the ink on the mat, and then set it aside to dry. I would put it on something non-porous, because anything porous or paper will absorb the water and ink from the ribbon.
My weapon is the Broken Heart
Good morning & Happy Friday! I'm looking forward to a relaxing weekend! In fact, the only plans we have are for a trip to Target (one of my favorite places!) and I might even sneak in a massage appointment and finally use the gift certificate that Jon gave me for Christmas!
Row 6: Knit row
I seriously could not have received a better message. I await everyday to be able to share this world I am living in with her, so that we can be one. I continued on with my day and realized that soon my dream would be a reality and I would not need to imagine anymore, but we should not stop imagining, if we continue to imagine hard enough it all comes true. There are so many people that imagine in this world especially in Valencia.........
In Psalm 3, you would expect King David to be gloomy and depressed… but the opposite was true. He was not in bondage to the trouble he was in. He expected the Lord to be the “lifter up of his head.” David was completely free from fear. Many rose up against David and said, “God will not help him this time.” But David declares, “But thou, O LORD, art a shield for me, the glory and the lifter of my head” (KJV). This verse shows David’s faith during his time of trouble. The word “trouble” as used here means “like a pebble in one’s shoe, a narrow or tight place, the crowding of an adversary, distress and anguish.” “To lift one’s head” refers to restoration to one’s former place (to rulership). In my trouble… God is the lifter of my head.
Eyes locked as I tell you that I love you,
Now it's ready to go inta a fantastic 8 x 8 scrapbook album which Neil altered for my birthday!
First up is M's Wikki Stix creation. If you have never played with Wikki Stix, then you have indeed had a sorry, empty existence. Not to pass judgement or anything, I'm just sayin'....
XX Fi XX
DIRECTOR : INTERNATIONAL REMITTANCE DEPARTMENT
After exploring Safranbolu a little morn the next morning we headed off in the morning to the next town on our list. While it was not too far on the map, it took us longer to reach Amasra than we had thought. Between the construction, the one-lane bridges and the mountain passes without guardrails it was an exciting drive. More on that later.
‘Born of God’ rings with echoes of John 3. But what John is talking about here is a supernatural birth. He is not talking about becoming something new or different or even improved by the exercise of human prowess or ingenuity or techniques. John is talking about the kind of birth that is a radical, violent collision of our old self with what God means to make us. It is not enough for us to be merely remodeled. We need to be radically overhauled. CS Lewis talks about us being completely undone and remade into an entirely new creature. Heart transplant—Ezekiel style recreations, Jeremiah type transplants. Born of God is an indication of something we cannot affect on our own and I don’t think we can predict the outcome either. But submission to God in this rebirth will allow his Spirit to upend us and challenge all our ideas. We cannot measure it, control it, or predict it. Born of God means that only God has the depth and measure of knowledge about how and where our growth will occur. As Jackman says, “It is only God who can give life.” (137) See also John 5:25.
Types of Electronic Translators
So I went to work crafting what will be my masterpiece of a ceramic bonfire. Professor Paul Nash has said more than once that you will probably have to do something 3 times before you get it right. That’s good. I’m ready for that, but I have found that with my lighting quick mind and ability it may easily take me 5 or 6 tries.
C.D: What is happiness?
Unfortunately, the book has a lot of repetition. Every time there’s a chance that Gin mentions her eyes or hair, their color is also mentioned; gray eyes and bleached blond hair. When an enemy makes a mistake Gin always thinks “Sloppy. Sloppy. Sloppy.” (But not when she makes a mistake, such as drooling over a detective so hard that she’s taken by surprise in the middle of an assassination.) I also had trouble believing that assassins really know each others “secret” assassin identities. The book is written in first person but Gin describes her own expressions a lot. There are also some contradictions. Gin mentions that the reason why elementals aren’t ruling everyone is because of guns. Yet, she thinks that guns jam too easily and uses knives and crossbows instead.
I followed the instructions exactly as Cathie described in her video and it worked great!!!!
That won’t be me
Chris Spedding (aka Peter Robinson), was born in the UK on June 17, 1944. A rock and roll & jazz guitarist, he's best known for his session work.
Now through out the movies I have two characters that battle for my attention. First is Dominic Toretto. I think I’ve summed it up in my review of the first Fast and Furious movie. It has to do with his charisma. The second character is first introduced in this movie, and yet again he oozes charisma, but one that is so laid back and happy with his place in the world you just want to be his friend. I’m speaking of Han as played by Sung Kung. Han is such a great presence I’m glad he was one of the things that carried through to the other movies. Speaking of great things Lucas Black as Sean Boswell impressed me greatly in the lead role. He’s a trouble maker, but a kid who wants to do well, he needs guidance. Thankfully both Sung and Lucas have a great chemistry which works well for the student mentor relationship.
